There was no safe anchorage at Pyke, but Theon Greyjoy wished to look on 
his father’s castle from the sea, to see it as he had seen it last, ten years 
before, when Robert Baratheon’s war galley had borne him away to be a ward of 
Eddard Stark. On that day he had stood beside the rail, listening to the stroke 
of the oars and the pounding of the master’s drum while he watched Pyke dwindle 
in the distance. Now he wanted to see it grow larger, to rise from the sea 
before him.Obedient to his wishes, the Myraham beat her way past the point 
with her sails snapping and her captain cursing the wind and his crew and the 
follies of highborn lordlings. Theon drew the hood of his cloak up against the 
spray, and looked for home.
The shore was all sharp rocks and glowering cliffs, and the castle seemed one 
with the rest, its towers and walls and bridges quarried from the same 
grey-black stone, wet by the same salt waves, festooned with the same spreading 
patches of dark green lichen, speckled by the droppings of the same seabirds. 
The point of land on which the Greyjoys had raised their fortress had once 
thrust like a sword into the bowels of the ocean, but the waves had hammered at 
it day and night until the land broke and shattered, thousands of years past. 
All that remained were three bare and barren islands and a dozen towering 
stacks of rock that

rose from the water like the pillars of some sea god’s temple, while the angry 
waves foamed and crashed among them.
Drear, dark, forbidding, Pyke stood atop those islands and pillars, almost a 
part of them, its curtain wall closing off the headland around the foot of the 
great stone bridge that leapt from the clifftop to the largest islet, dominated 
by the massive bulk of the Great Keep. Farther out were the Kitchen Keep and 
the Bloody Keep, each on its own island. Towers and outbuildings clung to the 
stacks beyond, linked to each other by covered archways when the pillars stood 
close, by long swaying walks of wood and rope when they did not.
The Sea Tower rose from the outmost island at the point of the broken sword, 
the oldest part of the castle, round and tall, the sheer-sided pillar on which 
it stood half-eaten through by the endless battering of the waves. The base of 
the tower was white from centuries of salt spray, the upper stories green from 
the lichen that crawled over it like a thick blanket, the jagged crown black 
with soot from its nightly watchfire.
Above the Sea Tower snapped his father’s banner. The Myraham was too 
far off for Theon to see more than the cloth itself, but he knew the device it 
bore: the golden kraken of House Greyjoy, arms writhing and reaching against a 
black field. The banner streamed from an iron mast, shivering and twisting as 
the wind gusted, like a bird struggling to take flight. And here at least the 
direwolf of Stark did not fly above, casting its shadow down upon the Greyjoy 
kraken.Theon had never seen a more stirring sight. In the sky behind the castle, 
the fine red tail of the comet was visible through thin, scuttling clouds. All 
the way from Riverrun to Seagard, the Mallisters had argued about its meaning. 
It is my comet, Theon told himself, sliding a hand into his fur-lined 
cloak to touch the oilskin pouch snug in its pocket. Inside was the letter Robb 
Stark had given him, paper as good as a crown.
“Does the castle look as you remember it, milord?” the captain’s daughter 
asked as she pressed herself against his arm.
“It looks smaller,” Theon confessed, “though perhaps that is only the 
distance.” The Myraham was a fat-bellied southron merchanter up from 
Oldtown, carrying wine and cloth and seed to trade for iron ore. Her captain 
was a fat-bellied southron merchanter as well, and the stony sea that foamed at 
the feet of the castle made his plump lips quiver, so he stayed well out, 
farther than Theon would have liked. An ironborn captain in a longship would 
have taken them along the cliffs and under the high bridge that spanned the gap 
between
the gatehouse and the Great Keep, but this plump Oldtowner had neither 
the craft, the crew, nor the courage to attempt such a thing. So they sailed 
past at a safe distance, and Theon must content himself with seeing Pyke from 
afar. Even so, the Myraham had to struggle mightily to keep itself 
off those rocks.
“It must be windy there,” the captain’s daughter observed.
He laughed. “Windy and cold and damp. A miserable hard place, in 
truth . . . but my lord father once told me that hard

places breed hard men, and hard men rule the world.”
The captain’s face was as green as the sea when he came bowing up to Theon and 
asked, “May we make for port now, milord?”
“You may,” Theon said, a faint smile playing about his lips. The promise of 
gold had turned the Oldtowner into a shameless lickspittle. It would have been 
a much different voyage if a longship from the islands had been waiting at 
Seagard as he’d hoped. Ironborn captains were proud and willful, and did not go 
in awe of a man’s blood. The islands were too small for awe, and a longship 
smaller still. If every captain was a king aboard his own ship, as was often 
said, it was small wonder they named the islands the land of ten thousand 
kings. And when you have seen your kings shit over the rail and turn green in a 
storm, it was hard to bend the knee
and pretend they were gods. “The Drowned 
God makes men,” old King Urron Redhand had once said, thousands of years ago, 
“but it’s men who make crowns.”
A longship would have made the crossing in half the time as well. The 
Myraham was a wallowing tub, if truth be told, and he would not care 
to be aboard her in a storm. Still, Theon could not be too unhappy. He was 
here, undrowned, and the voyage had offered certain other amusements. He put an 
arm around the captain’s daughter. “Summon me when we make Lordsport,” he 
told her father. “We’ll be below, in my cabin.” He led the girl away aft, 
while her father watched them go in sullen silence.
The cabin was the captain’s, in truth, but it had been turned over to Theon’s 
use when they sailed from
Seagard. The

captain’s daughter had not been turned over to his use, but she had come to his 
bed willingly enough all the same. A cup of wine, a few whispers, and there she 
was. The girl was a shade plump for his taste, with skin as splotchy as 
oatmeal, but her breasts filled his hands nicely and she had been a maiden the 
first time he took her. That was surprising at her age, but Theon found it 
diverting. He did not think the captain approved, and that was amusing as well, 
watching the man struggle to swallow his outrage while performing his 
courtesies to the high lord, the rich purse of gold he’d been promised never 
far from his thoughts.
As Theon shrugged out of his wet cloak, the girl said, “You must be so happy 
to see your home again, milord. How many years have you been away?”
“Ten, or close as makes no matter,” he told her. “I was a boy of ten when I 
was taken to Winterfell as a ward of Eddard Stark.” A ward in name, a hostage 
in truth. Half his days a hostage . . . but no longer. His life 
was his own again, and nowhere a Stark to be seen. He drew the captain’s 
daughter close and kissed her on her ear. “Take off your cloak.”
She dropped her eyes, suddenly shy, but did as he bid her. When the heavy 
garment, sodden with spray, fell from her shoulders to the deck, she gave him a 
little bow and smiled anxiously. She looked rather stupid when she smiled, but 
he had never required a woman to be clever. “Come here,” he told 
her.
She did. “I have never seen the Iron Islands.”
“Count yourself fortunate.” Theon stroked her hair. It was

fine and dark, though the wind had made a tangle of it. “The islands are stern 
and stony places, scant of comfort and bleak of prospect. Death is never far 
here, and life is mean and meager. Men spend their nights drinking ale and 
arguing over whose lot is worse, the fisherfolk who fight the sea or the 
farmers who try and scratch a crop from the poor thin soil. If truth be told, 
the miners have it worse than either, breaking their backs down in the dark, 
and for what? Iron, lead, tin, those are our treasures. Small wonder the 
ironmen of old turned to raiding.”
The stupid girl did not seem to be listening. “I could go ashore with you,” 
she said. “I would, if it please you . . .”
“You could go ashore,” Theon agreed, squeezing her breast, “but not with me, 
I fear.”
“I’d work in your castle, milord. I can clean fish and bake bread and churn 
butter. Father says my peppercrab stew is the best he’s ever tasted. You could 
find me a place in your kitchens and I could make you peppercrab 
stew.”
“And warm my bed by night?” He reached for the laces of her bodice and began 
to undo them, his fingers deft and practiced. “Once I might have carried you 
home as a prize, and kept you to wife whether you willed it or no. The ironmen 
of old did such things. A man had his rock wife, his true bride, ironborn like 
himself, but he had his salt wives too, women captured on raids.”
The girl’s eyes grew wide, and not because he had bared her breasts. “I would 
be your salt wife, milord.”
“I fear those days are gone.” Theon’s finger circled one

heavy teat, spiraling in toward the fat brown nipple. “No longer may we ride 
the wind with fire and sword, taking what we want. Now we scratch in the ground 
and toss lines in the sea like other men, and count ourselves lucky if we have 
salt cod and porridge enough to get us through a winter.” He took her nipple 
in his mouth, and bit it until she gasped.
“You can put it in me again, if it please you,” she whispered in his ear as 
he sucked.
When he raised his head from her breast, the skin was dark red where his mouth 
had marked her. “It would please me to teach you something new. Unlace me and 
pleasure me with your mouth.”
“With my mouth?”
His thumb brushed lightly over her full lips. “It’s what those lips were made 
for, sweetling. If you were my salt wife, you’d do as I command.”
She was timid at first, but learned quickly for such a stupid girl, which 
pleased him. Her mouth was as wet and sweet as her cunt, and this way he did 
not have to listen to her mindless prattle. Once I would have kept her as 
a salt wife in truth, he thought to himself as he slid his fingers through 
her tangled hair. Once. When we still kept the Old Way, lived by the axe 
instead of the pick, taking what we would, be it wealth, women, or glory. 
In those days, the ironborn did not work mines; that was labor for the captives 
brought back from the hostings, and so too the sorry business of farming and 
tending goats and sheep. War was an ironman’s proper trade. The Drowned God had 
made them to

reave and rape, to carve out kingdoms and write their names in fire and blood 
and song.
Aegon the Dragon had destroyed the Old Way when he burned Black Harren, gave 
Harren’s kingdom back to the weakling rivermen, and reduced the Iron Islands to 
an insignificant backwater of a much greater realm. Yet the old red tales were 
still told around driftwood fires and smoky hearths all across the islands, 
even behind the high stone halls of Pyke. Theon’s father numbered among his 
titles the style of Lord Reaper, and the Greyjoy words boasted that We Do 
Not Sow.
It had been to bring back the Old Way more than for the empty vanity of a crown 
that Lord Balon had staged his great rebellion. Robert Baratheon had written a 
bloody end to that hope, with the help of his friend Eddard Stark, but both men 
were dead now. Mere boys ruled in their stead, and the realm that Aegon the 
Conqueror had forged was smashed and sundered. This is the season, 
Theon thought as the captain’s daughter slid her lips up and down the length of 
him, the season, the year, the day, and I am the man. He smiled 
crookedly, wondering what his father would say when Theon told him that he, the 
last-born, babe and hostage, he had succeeded where Lord Balon 
himself had failed.
His climax came on him sudden as a storm, and he filled the girl’s mouth with 
his seed. Startled, she tried to pull away, but Theon held her tight by the 
hair. Afterward, she crawled up beside him. “Did I please milord?”
“Well enough,” he told her.“It tasted salty,” she murmured.
“Like the sea?”
She nodded. “I have always loved the sea, milord.”
“As I have,” he said, rolling her nipple idly between his fingers. It was 
true. The sea meant freedom to the men of the Iron Islands. He had forgotten 
that until the Myraham had raised sail at Seagard. The sounds brought 
old feelings back; the creak of wood and rope, the captain’s shouted commands, 
the snap of the sails as the wind filled them, each as familiar as the beating 
of his own heart, and as comforting. I must remember this, Theon 
vowed to himself. I must never go far from the sea again.
“Take me with you, milord,” the captain’s daughter begged. “I don’t need to 
go to your castle. I can stay in some town, and be your salt wife.” She 
reached out to stroke his cheek.
Theon Greyjoy pushed her hand aside and climbed off the bunk. “My place is 
Pyke, and yours is on this ship.”
“I can’t stay here now.”
He laced up his breeches. “Why not?”
“My father,” she told him. “Once you’re gone, he’ll punish me, milord. He’ll 
call me names and hit me.”
Theon swept his cloak off its peg and over his shoulders. “Fathers are like 
that,” he admitted as he pinned the folds with a silver clasp. “Tell him he 
should be pleased. As many times as I’ve fucked you, you’re likely with child. 
It’s not every man who has the honor of raising a king’s bastard.” She looked 
at him stupidly, so he left her there.The Myraham was rounding a wooded point. Below the pine-clad 
bluffs, a dozen fishing boats were pulling in their nets. The big cog stayed 
well out from them, tacking. Theon moved to the bow for a better view. He saw 
the castle first, the stronghold of the Botleys. When he was a boy it had been 
timber and wattle, but Robert Baratheon had razed that structure to the ground. 
Lord Sawane had rebuilt in stone, for now a small square keep crowned the hill. 
Pale green flags drooped from the squat corner towers, each emblazoned with a 
shoal of silvery fish.
Beneath the dubious protection of the fish-ridden little castle lay the village 
of Lordsport, its harbor aswarm with ships. When last he’d seen Lordsport, it 
had been a smoking wasteland, the skeletons of burnt longships and smashed 
galleys littering the stony shore like the bones of dead leviathans, the houses 
no more than broken walls and cold ashes. After ten years, few traces of the 
war remained. The smallfolk had built new hovels with the stones of the old, 
and cut fresh sod for their roofs. A new inn had risen beside the landing, 
twice the size of the old one, with a lower story of cut stone and two upper 
stories of timber. The sept beyond had never been rebuilt, though; only a 
seven-sided foundation remained where it had stood. Robert Baratheon’s fury had 
soured the ironmen’s taste for the new gods, it would seem.
Theon was more interested in ships than gods. Among the masts of countless 
fishing boats, he spied a Tyroshi trading galley off-loading beside a lumbering 
Ibbenese cog with her black-tarred hull. A great number of longships, fifty or 
sixty at the

least, stood out to sea or lay beached on the pebbled shore to the north. Some 
of the sails bore devices from the other islands; the blood moon of Wynch, Lord 
Goodbrother’s banded black warhorn, Harlaw’s silver scythe. Theon searched for 
his uncle Euron’s Silence. Of that lean and terrible red ship he saw 
no sign, but his father’s Great Kraken was there, her bow ornamented 
with a grey iron ram in the shape of its namesake.
Had Lord Balon anticipated him and called the Greyjoy banners? His hand went 
inside his cloak again, to the oilskin pouch. No one knew of his letter but 
Robb Stark; they were no fools, to entrust their secrets to a bird. Still, Lord 
Balon was no fool either. He might well have guessed why his son was coming 
home at long last, and acted accordingly.
The thought did not please him. His father’s war was long done, and lost. This 
was Theon’s hour—his plan, his glory, and in time his crown. Yet if 
the longships are hosting . . .
It might be only a caution, now that he thought on it. A defensive move, lest 
the war spill out across the sea. Old men were cautious by nature. His father 
was old now, and so too his uncle Victarion, who commanded the Iron Fleet. His 
uncle Euron was a different song, to be sure, but the Silence did not 
seem to be in port. It’s all for the good, Theon told himself. 
This way, I shall be able to strike all the more quickly.
As the Myraham made her way landward, Theon paced the deck 
restlessly, scanning the shore. He had not thought to find Lord Balon himself 
at quayside, but surely his father would have sent

someone to meet him. Sylas Sourmouth the steward, Lord Botley, perhaps even 
Dagmer Cleftjaw. It would be good to look on Dagmer’s hideous old face again. 
It was not as though they had no word of his arrival. Robb had sent ravens from 
Riverrun, and when they’d found no longship at Seagard, Jason Mallister had 
sent his own birds to Pyke, supposing that Robb’s were lost.
Yet he saw no familiar faces, no honor guard waiting to escort him from 
Lordsport to Pyke, only smallfolk going about their small business. Shorehands 
rolled casks of wine off the Tyroshi trader, fisherfolk cried the day’s catch, 
children ran and played. A priest in the seawater robes of the Drowned God was 
leading a pair of horses along the pebbled shore, while above him a slattern 
leaned out a window in the inn, calling out to some passing Ibbenese 
sailors.
A handful of Lordsport merchants had gathered to meet the ship. They shouted 
questions as the Myraham was tying up. “We’re out of Oldtown,” the 
captain called down, “bearing apples and oranges, wines from the Arbor, 
feathers from the Summer Isles. I have pepper, woven leathers, a bolt of Myrish 
lace, mirrors for milady, a pair of Oldtown woodharps sweet as any you ever 
heard.” The gangplank descended with a creak and a thud. “And I’ve brought 
your heir back to you.”
The Lordsport men gazed on Theon with blank, bovine eyes, and he realized that 
they did not know who he was. It made him angry. He pressed a golden dragon 
into the captain’s palm. “Have your men bring my things.” Without waiting for 
a reply, he strode

down the gangplank. “Innkeeper,” he barked, “I require a horse.”
“As you say, m’lord,” the man responded, without so much as a bow. He had 
forgotten how bold the ironborn could be. “Happens as I have one might do. 
Where would you be riding, m’lord?”
“Pyke.” The fool still did not know him. He should have worn his 
good doublet, with the kraken embroidered on the breast.
“You’ll want to be off soon, to reach Pyke afore dark,” the innkeeper said. 
“My boy will go with you and show you the way.”
“Your boy will not be needed,” a deep voice called, “nor your horse. I shall 
see my nephew back to his father’s house.”
The speaker was the priest he had seen leading the horses along the shoreline. 
As the man approached, the smallfolk bent the knee, and Theon heard the
innkeeper 
murmur, “Damphair.”
Tall and thin, with fierce black eyes and a beak of a nose, the priest was 
garbed in mottled robes of green and grey and blue, the swirling colors of the 
Drowned God. A waterskin hung under his arm on a leather strap, and ropes of 
dried seaweed were braided through his waist-long black hair and untrimmed 
beard.
A memory prodded at Theon. In one of his rare curt letters, Lord Balon had 
written of his youngest brother going down in a storm, and turning holy when he 
washed up safe on shore. “Uncle Aeron?” he said doubtfully.
“Nephew Theon,” the priest replied. “Your lord father bid me fetch you. 
Come.”
“In a moment, Uncle.” He turned back to the Myraham. “My things,” 
he commanded the captain.A sailor fetched him down his tall yew bow and quiver of arrows, but it 
was the captain’s daughter who brought the pack with his good clothing. 
“Milord.” Her eyes were red. When he took the pack, she made as if to embrace 
him, there in front of her own father and his priestly uncle and half the 
island.
Theon turned deftly aside. “You have my thanks.”
“Please,” she said, “I do love you well, milord.”
“I must go.” He hurried after his uncle, who was already well down the pier. 
Theon caught him with a dozen long strides. “I had not looked for you, Uncle. 
After ten years, I thought perhaps my lord father and lady mother might come 
themselves, or send Dagmer with an honor guard.”
“It is not for you to question the commands of the Lord Reaper of Pyke.” The 
priest’s manner was chilly, most unlike the man Theon remembered. Aeron Greyjoy 
had been the most amiable of his uncles, feckless and quick to laugh, fond of 
songs, ale, and women. “As to Dagmer, the Cleftjaw is gone to Old Wyk at
your father’s behest, to roust the Stonehouses and the Drumms.”
“To what purpose? Why are the longships hosting?”
“Why have longships ever hosted?” His uncle had left the horses tied up in 
front of the waterside inn. When they reached them, he turned to Theon. “Tell 
me true, nephew. Do you pray to the wolf gods now?”
Theon seldom prayed at all, but that was not something you confessed to a 
priest, even your father’s own brother. “Ned Stark prayed to a tree. No, I 
care nothing for Stark’s gods.”“Good. Kneel.”
The ground was all stones and mud. “Uncle, I—”
“Kneel. Or are you too proud now, a lordling of the green lands come 
among us?”
Theon knelt. He had a purpose here, and might need Aeron’s help to achieve it. 
A crown was worth a little mud and horseshit on his breeches, he 
supposed.
“Bow your head.” Lifting the skin, his uncle pulled the cork and directed a 
thin stream of seawater down upon Theon’s head. It drenched his hair and ran 
over his forehead into his eyes. Sheets washed down his cheeks, and a finger 
crept under his cloak and doublet and down his back, a cold rivulet along his 
spine. The salt made his eyes burn, until it was all he could do not to cry 
out. He could taste the ocean on his lips. “Let Theon your servant be born 
again from the sea, as you were,” Aeron Greyjoy intoned. “Bless him with 
salt, bless him with stone, bless him with steel. Nephew, do you still know the 
words?”
“What is dead may never die,” Theon said, remembering.
“What is dead may never die,” his uncle echoed, “but rises again, harder and 
stronger. Stand.”
Theon stood, blinking back tears from the salt in his eyes. Wordless, his uncle 
corked the waterskin, untied his horse, and mounted. Theon did the same. They 
set off together, leaving the inn and the harbor behind them, up past the 
castle of Lord Botley into the stony hills. The priest ventured no further 
word.
“I have been half my life away from home,” Theon ventured at

last. “Will I find the islands changed?”
“Men fish the sea, dig in the earth, and die. Women birth children in blood 
and pain, and die. Night follows day. The winds and tides remain. The islands 
are as our god made them.”
Gods, he has grown grim, Theon thought. “Will I find my sister and 
my lady mother at Pyke?”
“You will not. Your mother dwells on Harlaw, with her own sister. It is less 
raw there, and her cough troubles her. Your sister has taken Black 
Wind to Great Wyk, with messages from your lord father. She will return 
e’er long, you may be sure.”
Theon did not need to be told that Black Wind was Asha’s longship. He 
had not seen his sister in ten years, but that much he knew of her. Odd that 
she would call it that, when Robb Stark had a wolf named Grey Wind. “Stark is 
grey and Greyjoy’s black,” he murmured, smiling, “but it seems we’re both 
windy.”
The priest had nothing to say to that.
“And what of you, Uncle?” Theon asked. “You were no priest when I was taken 
from Pyke. I remember how you would sing the old reaving songs standing on the 
table with a horn of ale in hand.”
“Young I was, and vain,” Aeron Greyjoy said, “but the sea washed my follies 
and my vanities away. That man drowned, nephew. His lungs filled with seawater, 
and the fish ate the scales off his eyes. When I rose again, I saw 
clearly.”
He is as mad as he is sour. Theon had liked what he remembered of the 
old Aeron Greyjoy. “Uncle, why has my father called his swords and 
sails?”“Doubtless he will tell you at Pyke.”
“I would know his plans now.”
“From me, you shall not. We are commanded not to speak of this to any 
man.”
“Even to me?” Theon’s anger flared. He’d led men in war, hunted 
with a king, won honor in tourney melees, ridden with Brynden Blackfish and 
Greatjon Umber, fought in the Whispering Wood, bedded more girls than he could 
name, and yet this uncle was treating him as though he were still a child of 
ten. “If my father makes plans for war, I must know of them. I am not 
‘any man,’ I am heir to Pyke and the Iron Islands.”
“As to that,” his uncle said, “we shall see.”
The words were a slap in the face. “We shall see? My brothers are 
both dead. I am my lord father’s only living son.”
“Your sister lives.”
Asha, he thought, confounded. She was three years older than Theon, 
yet still . . . “A woman may inherit only if there is no male 
heir in the direct line,” he insisted loudly. “I will not be cheated of my 
rights, I warn you.”
His uncle grunted. “You warn a servant of the Drowned God, boy? You 
have forgotten more than you know. And you are a great fool if you believe your 
lord father will ever hand these holy islands over to a Stark. Now be silent. 
The ride is long enough without your magpie chatterings.”
Theon held his tongue, though not without struggle. So that is the way of 
it, he thought. As if ten years in Winterfell could

make a Stark. Lord Eddard had raised him among his own children, but Theon had 
never been one of them. The whole castle, from Lady Stark to the lowliest 
kitchen scullion, knew he was hostage to his father’s good behavior, and 
treated him accordingly. Even the bastard Jon Snow had been accorded more honor 
than he had.
Lord Eddard had tried to play the father from time to time, but to Theon he had 
always remained the man who’d brought blood and fire to Pyke and taken him from 
his home. As a boy, he had lived in fear of Stark’s stern face and great dark 
sword. His wife was, if anything, even more distant and suspicious.
As for their children, the younger ones had been mewling babes for most of his 
years at Winterfell. Only Robb and his baseborn half brother Jon Snow had been 
old enough to be worth his notice. The bastard was a sullen boy, quick to sense 
a slight, jealous of Theon’s high birth and Robb’s regard for him. For Robb 
himself, Theon did have a certain affection, as for a younger 
brother . . . but it would be best not to mention that. In 
Pyke, it would seem, the old wars were still being fought. That ought not 
surprise him. The Iron Islands lived in the past; the present was too hard and 
bitter to be borne. Besides, his father and uncles were old, and the old lords 
were like that; they took their dusty feuds to the grave, forgetting nothing 
and forgiving less.
It had been the same with the Mallisters, his companions on the ride from 
Riverrun to Seagard. Patrek Mallister was not too ill a fellow; they shared a 
taste for wenches, wine, and hawking. But when old Lord Jason saw his heir 
growing overly fond of

Theon’s company, he had taken Patrek aside to remind him that Seagard had been 
built to defend the coast against reavers from the Iron Islands, the Greyjoys 
of Pyke chief among them. Their Booming Tower was named for its immense bronze 
bell, rung of old to call the townsfolk and farmhands into the castle when 
longships were sighted on the western horizon.
“Never mind that the bell has been rung just once in three hundred years,” 
Patrek had told Theon the day after, as he shared his father’s cautions and a 
jug of green-apple wine.
“When my brother stormed Seagard,” Theon said. Lord Jason had slain Rodrik 
Greyjoy under the walls of the castle, and thrown the ironmen back into the 
bay. “If your father supposes I bear him some enmity for that, it’s only 
because he never knew Rodrik.”
They had a laugh over that as they raced ahead to an amorous young miller’s 
wife that Patrek knew. Would that Patrek were with me now. Mallister 
or no, he was a more amiable riding companion than this sour old priest that 
his uncle Aeron had turned into.
The path they rode wound up and up, into bare and stony hills. Soon they were 
out of sight of the sea, though the smell of salt still hung sharp in the damp 
air. They kept a steady plodding pace, past a shepherd’s croft and the 
abandoned workings of a mine. This new, holy Aeron Greyjoy was not much for 
talk. They rode in a gloom of silence. Finally Theon could suffer it no longer. 
“Robb Stark is Lord of Winterfell now,” he said.
Aeron rode on. “One wolf is much like the other.”
“Robb has broken fealty with the Iron Throne and crowned

himself King in the North. There’s war.”
“The maester’s ravens fly over salt as soon as rock. This news is old and 
cold.”
“It means a new day, Uncle.”
“Every morning brings a new day, much like the old.”
“In Riverrun, they would tell you different. They say the red comet is a 
herald of a new age. A messenger from the gods.”
“A sign it is,” the priest agreed, “but from our god, not theirs. A burning 
brand it is, such as our people carried of old. It is the flame the Drowned God 
brought from the sea, and it proclaims a rising tide. It is time to hoist our 
sails and go forth into the world with fire and sword, as he did.”
Theon smiled. “I could not agree more.”
“A man agrees with god as a raindrop with the storm.”
This raindrop will one day be a king, old man. Theon had suffered 
quite enough of his uncle’s gloom. He put his spurs into his horse and trotted 
on ahead, smiling.
It was nigh on sunset when they reached the walls of Pyke, a crescent of dark 
stone that ran from cliff to cliff, with the gatehouse in the center and three 
square towers to either side. Theon could still make out the scars left by the 
stones of Robert Baratheon’s catapults. A new south tower had risen from the 
ruins of the old, its stone a paler shade of grey, and as yet unmarred by 
patches of lichen. That was where Robert had made his breach, swarming in over 
the rubble and corpses with his warhammer in hand and Ned Stark at his side. 
Theon had watched from the safety of

the Sea Tower, and sometimes he still saw the torches in his dreams, and heard 
the dull thunder of the collapse.
The gates stood open to him, the rusted iron portcullis drawn up. The guards 
atop the battlements watched with strangers’ eyes as Theon Greyjoy came home at 
last.
Beyond the curtain wall were half a hundred acres of headland hard against the 
sky and the sea. The stables were here, and the kennels, and a scatter of other 
outbuildings. Sheep and swine huddled in their pens while the castle dogs ran 
free. To the south were the cliffs, and the wide stone bridge to the Great 
Keep. Theon could hear the crashing of waves as he swung down from his saddle. 
A stableman came to take his horse. A pair of gaunt children and some thralls 
stared at him with dull eyes, but there was no sign of his lord father, nor 
anyone else he recalled from boyhood. A bleak and bitter
homecoming, 
he thought.
The priest had not dismounted. “Will you not stay the night and share our meat 
and mead, Uncle?”
“Bring you, I was told. You are brought. Now I return to our god’s business.” 
Aeron Greyjoy turned his horse and rode slowly out beneath the muddy spikes of 
the portcullis.
A bentback old crone in a shapeless grey dress approached him warily. “M’lord, 
I am sent to show you to chambers.”
“By whose bidding?”
“Your lord father, m’lord.”
Theon pulled off his gloves. “So you do know who I am. Why is my 
father not here to greet me?”“He awaits you in the Sea Tower, m’lord. When you are rested from your 
trip.”
And I thought Ned Stark cold. “And who are you?”
“Helya, who keeps this castle for your lord father.”
“Sylas was steward here. They called him Sourmouth.” Even now, Theon could 
recall the winey stench of the old man’s breath.
“Dead these five years, m’lord.”
“And what of Maester Qalen, where is he?”
“He sleeps in the sea. Wendamyr keeps the ravens now.”
It is as if I were a stranger here, Theon thought. Nothing has 
changed, and yet everything has changed. “Show me to my chambers, 
woman,” he commanded. Bowing stiffly, she led him across the headland to the 
bridge. That at least was as he remembered; the ancient stones slick with spray 
and spotted by lichen, the sea foaming under their feet like some great wild 
beast, the salt wind clutching at their clothes.
Whenever he’d imagined his homecoming, he had always pictured himself returning 
to the snug bedchamber in the Sea Tower, where he’d slept as a child. Instead 
the old woman led him to the Bloody Keep. The halls here were larger and better 
furnished, if no less cold nor damp. Theon was given a suite of chilly rooms 
with ceilings so high that they were lost in gloom. He might have been more 
impressed if he had not known that these were the very chambers that had given 
the Bloody Keep its name. A thousand years before, the sons of the River King 
had been slaughtered here, hacked to bits in their beds so that pieces of their 
bodies

might be sent back to their father on the mainland.
But Greyjoys were not murdered in Pyke except once in a great while by their 
brothers, and his brothers were both dead. It was not fear of ghosts that made 
him glance about with distaste. The wall hangings were green with mildew, the 
mattress musty-smelling and sagging, the rushes old and brittle. Years had come 
and gone since these chambers had last been opened. The damp went bone deep. 
“I’ll have a basin of hot water and a fire in this hearth,” he told the 
crone. “See that they light braziers in the other rooms to drive out some of 
the chill. And gods be good, get someone in here at once to change these 
rushes.”
“Yes, m’lord. As you command.” She fled.
After some time, they brought the hot water he had asked for. It was only 
tepid, and soon cold, and seawater in the bargain, but it served to wash the 
dust of the long ride from his face and hair and hands. While two thralls lit 
his braziers, Theon stripped off his travel-stained clothing and dressed to 
meet his father. He chose boots of supple black leather, soft lambswool 
breeches of silvery-grey, a black velvet doublet with the golden
kraken of the 
Greyjoys embroidered on the breast. Around his throat he fastened a slender 
gold chain, around his waist a belt of bleached white leather. He hung a dirk 
at one hip and a longsword at the other, in scabbards striped black-and-gold. 
Drawing the dirk, he tested its edge with his thumb, pulled a whetstone from 
his belt pouch, and gave it a few licks. He prided himself on keeping his 
weapons sharp. “When I return, I shall

expect a warm room and clean rushes,” he warned the thralls as he drew on a 
pair of black gloves, the silk decorated with a delicate scrollwork tracery in 
golden thread.
Theon returned to the Great Keep through a covered stone walkway, the echoes of 
his footsteps mingling with the ceaseless rumble of the sea below. To get to 
the Sea Tower on its crooked pillar, he had to cross three further bridges, 
each narrower than the one before. The last was made of rope and wood, and the 
wet salt wind made it sway underfoot like a living thing. Theon’s heart was in 
his mouth by the time he was halfway across. A long way below, the waves threw 
up tall plumes of spray as they crashed against the rock. As a boy, he used to 
run across this bridge, even in the black of night. Boys believe 
nothing can hurt them, his doubt whispered. Grown men know 
better.
The door was grey wood studded with iron, and Theon found it barred from the 
inside. He hammered on it with a fist, and cursed when a splinter snagged the 
fabric of his glove. The wood was damp and moldy, the iron studs 
rusted.
After a moment the door was opened from within by a guard in a black iron 
breastplate and pothelm. “You are the son?”
“Out of my way, or you’ll learn who I am.” The man stood aside. Theon climbed 
the twisting steps to the solar. He found his father seated beside a brazier, 
beneath a robe of musty sealskins that covered him foot to chin. At the sound 
of boots on stone, the Lord of the Iron Islands lifted his eyes to behold his 
last living son. He was smaller than Theon remembered him. And

so gaunt. Balon Greyjoy had always been thin, but now he looked as though the 
gods had put him in a cauldron and boiled every spare ounce of flesh from his 
bones, until nothing remained but hair and skin. Bone thin and bone hard he 
was, with a face that might have been chipped from flint. His eyes were flinty 
too, black and sharp, but the years and the salt winds had turned his hair the 
grey of a winter sea, flecked with whitecaps. Unbound, it hung past the small 
of the back.
“Nine years, is it?” Lord Balon said at last.
“Ten,” Theon answered, pulling off his torn gloves.
“A boy they took,” his father said. “What are you now?”
“A man,” Theon answered. “Your blood and your heir.”
Lord Balon grunted. “We shall see.”
“You shall,” Theon promised.
“Ten years, you say. Stark had you as long as I. And now you come as his 
envoy.”
“Not his,” Theon said. “Lord Eddard is dead, beheaded by the Lannister 
queen.”
“They are both dead, Stark and that Robert who broke my walls with his stones. 
I vowed I’d live to see them both in their graves, and I have.” He grimaced. 
“Yet the cold and the damp still make my joints ache, as when they were alive. 
So what does it serve?”
“It serves.” Theon moved closer. “I bring a 
letter—”
“Did Ned Stark dress you like that?” his father interrupted, squinting up 
from beneath his robe. “Was it his pleasure to garb

you in velvets and silks and make you his own sweet daughter?”
Theon felt the blood rising to his face. “I am no man’s daughter. If you 
mislike my garb, I will change it.”
“You will.” Throwing off the furs, Lord Balon pushed himself to his feet. He 
was not so tall as Theon remembered. “That bauble around your neck—was 
it bought with gold or iron?”
Theon touched the gold chain. He had forgotten. It has been so 
long . . . In the Old Way, women might decorate themselves 
with ornaments bought with coin, but a warrior wore only the jewelry he took 
off the corpses of enemies slain by his own hand. Paying the iron 
price, it was called.
“You blush red as a maid, Theon. A question was asked. Is it the gold price 
you paid, or the iron?”
“The gold,” Theon admitted.
His father slid his fingers under the necklace and gave it a yank so hard it 
was like to take Theon’s head off, had the chain not snapped first. “My 
daughter has taken an axe for a lover,” Lord Balon said. “I will not have my 
son bedeck himself like a whore.” He dropped the broken chain onto the 
brazier, where it slid down among the coals. “It is as I feared. The green 
lands have made you soft, and the Starks have made you theirs.”
“You’re wrong. Ned Stark was my gaoler, but my blood is still salt and 
iron.”
Lord Balon turned away to warm his bony hands over the brazier. “Yet the Stark 
pup sends you to me like a well-trained raven, clutching his little 
message.”“There is nothing small about the letter I bear,” Theon said, “and the 
offer he makes is one I suggested to him.”
“This wolf king heeds your counsel, does he?” The notion seemed to amuse Lord 
Balon.
“He heeds me, yes. I’ve hunted with him, trained with him, shared meat and 
mead with him, warred at his side. I have earned his trust. He looks on me as 
an older brother, he—”
“No.” His father jabbed a finger at his face. “Not here, not in 
Pyke, not in my hearing, you will not name him brother, this son of 
the man who put your true brothers to the sword. Or have you forgotten Rodrik 
and Maron, who were your own blood?”
“I forget nothing.” Ned Stark had killed neither of his brothers, in truth. 
Rodrik had been slain by Lord Jason Mallister at Seagard, Maron crushed in the 
collapse of the old south tower . . . but Stark would 
have done for them just as quick had the tide of battle chanced to sweep them 
together. “I remember my brothers very well,” Theon insisted. Chiefly he 
remembered Rodrik’s drunken cuffs and Maron’s cruel japes and endless lies. “I 
remember when my father was a king too.” He took out Robb’s letter and thrust 
it forward. “Here. Read it . . . Your Grace.”
Lord Balon broke the seal and unfolded the parchment. His black eyes flicked 
back and forth. “So the boy would give me a crown again,” he said, “and all 
I need do is destroy his enemies.” His thin lips twisted in a smile.
“By now Robb is at the Golden Tooth,” Theon said. “Once it falls, he’ll be 
through the hills in a day. Lord Tywin’s host is

at Harrenhal, cut off from the west. The Kingslayer is a captive at Riverrun. 
Only Ser Stafford Lannister and the raw green levies he’s been gathering remain 
to oppose Robb in the west. Ser Stafford will put himself between Robb’s army 
and Lannisport, which means the city will be undefended when we descend on it 
by sea. If the gods are with us, even Casterly Rock itself may fall before the 
Lannisters so much as realize that we are upon them.”
Lord Balon grunted. “Casterly Rock has never fallen.”
“Until now.” Theon smiled. And how sweet that
will be.
His father did not return the smile. “So this is why Robb Stark sends you back 
to me, after so long? So you might win my consent to this plan of 
his?”
“It is my plan, not Robb’s,” Theon said proudly. Mine, as the victory 
will be mine, and in time the crown. “I will lead the attack myself, if 
it please you. As my reward I would ask that you grant me Casterly Rock for my 
own seat, once we have taken it from the Lannisters.” With the Rock, he could 
hold Lannisport and the golden lands of the west. It would mean wealth and 
power such as House Greyjoy had never known.
“You reward yourself handsomely for a notion and a few lines of scribbling.” 
His father read the letter again. “The pup says nothing about a reward. Only 
that you speak for him, and I am to listen, and give him my sails and swords, 
and in return he will give me a crown.” His flinty eyes lifted to meet his 
son’s. “He will give me a crown,” he repeated, his voice growing 
sharp.
“A poor choice of words, what is meant is—”“What is meant is what is said. The boy will give me a crown. 
And what is given can be taken away.” Lord Balon tossed the letter onto the 
brazier, atop the necklace. The parchment curled, blackened, and took 
flame.
Theon was aghast. “Have you gone mad?”
His father laid a stinging backhand across his cheek. “Mind your tongue. You 
are not in Winterfell now, and I am not Robb the Boy, that you should speak to 
me so. I am the Greyjoy, Lord Reaper of Pyke, King of Salt and Rock, Son of the 
Sea Wind, and no man gives me a crown. I pay the iron price. I will 
take my crown, as Urron Redhand did five thousand years 
ago.”
Theon edged backward, away from the sudden fury in his father’s tone. “Take
it,
then,” he spat, his cheek still tingling. “Call yourself King of the Iron 
Islands, no one will care . . . until the wars are over, and 
the victor looks about and spies the old fool perched off his shore with an 
iron crown on his head.”
Lord Balon laughed. “Well, at the least you are no craven. No more than I’m a 
fool. Do you think I gather my ships to watch them rock at anchor? I mean to 
carve out a kingdom with fire and sword . . . but not from the 
west, and not at the bidding of King Robb the Boy. Casterly Rock is too strong, 
and Lord Tywin too cunning by half. Aye, we might take Lannisport, but we 
should never keep it. No. I hunger for a different 
plum . . . not so juicy sweet, to be sure, yet it hangs there 
ripe and undefended.”
Where? Theon might have asked, but by then he knew.

She was undeniably a beauty. But your first is always beautiful, 
Theon Greyjoy thought.
“Now there’s a pretty grin,” a woman’s voice said behind him. “The lordling 
likes the look of her, does he?”
Theon turned to give her an appraising glance. He liked what he saw. Ironborn, 
he knew at a glance; lean and long-legged, with black hair cut short, 
wind-chafed skin, strong sure hands, a dirk at her belt. Her nose was too big 
and too sharp for her thin face, but her smile made up for it. He judged her a 
few years older than he was, but no more than five-and-twenty. She moved as if 
she were used to a deck beneath her feet.“Yes, she’s a sweet sight,” he told her, “though not half so sweet as 
you.”
“Oho.” She grinned. “I’d best be careful. This lordling has a honeyed 
tongue.”
“Taste it and see.”
“Is it that way, then?” she said, eyeing him boldly. There were women on the 
Iron Islands—not many, but a few—who crewed the longships along 
with their men, and it was said that salt and sea changed them, gave them a 
man’s appetites. “Have you been that long at sea, lordling? Or were there no 
women where you came from?”“Women enough, but none like you.”
“And how would you know what I’m like?”
“My eyes can see your face. My ears can hear your laughter. And my cock’s gone 
hard as a mast for you.”
The woman stepped close and pressed a hand to the front of his breeches. 
“Well, you’re no liar,” she said, giving him a squeeze through the cloth. 
“How bad does it hurt?”
“Fiercely.”
“Poor lordling.” She released him and stepped back. “As it happens, I’m a 
woman wed, and new with child.”
“The gods are good,” Theon said. “No chance I’d give you a bastard that 
way.”
“Even so, my man wouldn’t thank you.”
“No, but you might.”
“And why would that be? I’ve had lords before. They’re made the same as other 
men.”
“Have you ever had a prince?” he asked her. “When you’re wrinkled and grey 
and your teats hang past your belly, you can tell your children’s children that 
once you loved a king.”
“Oh, is it love we’re talking now? And here I thought it was just cocks and 
cunts.”
“Is it love you fancy?” He’d decided that he liked this wench, whoever she 
was; her sharp wit was a welcome respite from the damp gloom of Pyke. “Shall I 
name my longship after you, and play you the high harp, and keep you in a tower 
room in my castle with only jewels to wear, like a princess in a song?”“You ought to name your ship after me,” she said, ignoring 
all the rest. “It was me who built her.”
“Sigrin built her. My lord father’s shipwright.”
“I’m Esgred. Ambrode’s daughter, and wife to Sigrin.”
He had not known that Ambrode had a daughter, or Sigrin a 
wife . . . but he’d met the younger shipwright only once, and 
the older one he scarce remembered. “You’re wasted on Sigrin.”
“Oho. Sigrin told me this sweet ship is wasted on you.”
Theon bristled. “Do you know who I am?”
“Prince Theon of House Greyjoy. Who else? Tell me true, my lord, how well do 
you love her, this new maid of yours? Sigrin will want to know.”
The longship was so new that she still smelled of pitch and resin. His uncle 
Aeron would bless her on the morrow, but Theon had ridden over from Pyke to get 
a look at her before she was launched. She was not so large as Lord Balon’s own 
Great Kraken or his uncle Victarion’s Iron Victory, but she 
looked swift and sweet, even sitting in her wooden cradle on the strand; lean 
black hull a hundred feet long, a single tall mast, fifty long oars, deck 
enough for a hundred men . . . and at the prow, the great iron 
ram in the shape of an arrowhead. “Sigrin did me good service,” he admitted. 
“Is she as fast as she looks?”
“Faster—for a master that knows how to handle her.”
“It has been a few years since I sailed a ship.” And I’ve never 
captained one, if truth be told. “Still, I’m a Greyjoy, and an ironman. 
The sea is in my blood.”“And your blood will be in the sea, if you sail the way you talk,” she 
told him.
“I would never mistreat such a fair maiden.”
“Fair maiden?” She laughed. “She’s a sea bitch, this one.”
“There, and now you’ve named her. Sea Bitch.”
That amused her; he could see the sparkle in her dark eyes. “And you said 
you’d name her after me,” she said in a voice of wounded reproach.
“I did.” He caught her hand. “Help me, my lady. In the green lands, they 
believe a woman with child means good fortune for any man who beds 
her.”
“And what would they know about ships in the green lands? Or women, for that 
matter? Besides, I think you made that up.”
“If I confess, will you still love me?”
“Still? When have I ever loved you?”
“Never,” he admitted, “but I am trying to repair that lack, my sweet Esgred. 
The wind is cold. Come aboard my ship and let me warm you. On the morrow my 
uncle Aeron will pour seawater over her prow and mumble a prayer to the Drowned 
God, but I’d sooner bless her with the milk of my loins, and yours.”
“The Drowned God might not take that kindly.”
“Bugger the Drowned God. If he troubles us, I’ll drown him again. We’re off to 
war within a fortnight. Would you send me into battle all sleepless with 
longing?”
“Gladly.”
“A cruel maid. My ship is well named. If I steer her onto

the rocks in my distraction, you’ll have yourself to blame.”
“Do you plan to steer with this?” Esgred brushed the front of his breeches 
once more, and smiled as a finger traced the iron outline of his 
manhood.
“Come back to Pyke with me,” he said suddenly, thinking, What will Lord 
Balon say? And why should I care? I am a man grown, if I want to bring a wench 
to bed it is no one’s business but my own.
“And what would I do in Pyke?” Her hand stayed where it was.
“My father will feast his captains tonight.” He had them to feast every 
night, while he waited for the last stragglers to arrive, but Theon saw no need 
to tell all that.
“Would you make me your captain for the night, my lord prince?” She had the 
wickedest smile he’d ever seen on a woman.
“I might. If I knew you’d steer me safe into port.”
“Well, I know which end of the oar goes in the sea, and there’s no one better 
with ropes and knots.” One-handed, she undid the lacing of his breeches, then 
grinned and stepped lightly away from him. “A pity I’m a woman wed, and new 
with child.”
Flustered, Theon laced himself back up. “I need to start back to the castle. 
If you do not come with me, I may lose my way for grief, and all the islands 
would be poorer.”
“We couldn’t have that . . . but I have no horse, my 
lord.”
“You could take my squire’s mount.”
“And leave your poor squire to walk all the way to Pyke?”
“Share mine, then.”
“You’d like that well enough.” The smile again. “Now,

would I be behind you, or in front?”
“You would be wherever you liked.”
“I like to be on top.”
Where has this wench been all my life? “My father’s hall is dim and 
dank. It needs Esgred to make the fires blaze.”
“The lordling has a honeyed tongue.”
“Isn’t that where we began?”
She threw up her hands. “And where we end. Esgred is yours, sweet prince. Take 
me to your castle. Let me see your proud towers rising from the 
sea.”
“I left my horse at the inn. Come.” They walked down the strand together, and 
when Theon took her arm, she did not pull away. He liked the way she walked; 
there was a boldness to it, part saunter and part sway, that suggested she 
would be just as bold beneath the blankets.
Lordsport was as crowded as he’d ever seen it, swarming with the crews of the 
longships that lined the pebbled shore and rode at anchor well out past the 
breakwater. Ironmen did not bend their knees often nor easily, but Theon noted 
that oarsmen and townfolk alike grew quiet as they passed, and acknowledged him 
with respectful bows of the head. They have finally learned who I am, 
he thought. And past time too.
Lord Goodbrother of Great Wyk had come in the night before with his main 
strength, near forty longships. His men were everywhere, conspicuous in their 
striped goat’s hair sashes. It was said about the inn that Otter Gimpknee’s 
whores were being

fucked bowlegged by beardless boys in sashes. The boys were welcome to them so 
far as Theon was concerned. A poxier den of slatterns he hoped he’d never see. 
His present companion was more to his taste. That she was wed to his father’s 
shipwright and pregnant to boot only made her more intriguing.
“Has my lord prince begun choosing his crew?” Esgred asked as they made their 
way toward the stable. “Ho, Bluetooth,” she shouted to a passing seafarer, a 
tall man in bearskin vest and raven-winged helm. “How fares your 
bride?”
“Fat with child, and talking of twins.”
“So soon?” Esgred smiled that wicked smile. “You got your oar in the water 
quickly.”
“Aye, and stroked and stroked and stroked,” roared the 
man.
“A big man,” Theon observed. “Bluetooth, was it? Should I choose him for my 
Sea Bitch?”
“Only if you mean to insult him. Bluetooth has a sweet ship of his 
own.”
“I have been too long away to know one man from another,” Theon admitted. 
He’d looked for a few of the friends he’d played with as a boy, but they were 
gone, dead, or grown into strangers. “My uncle Victarion has loaned me his own 
steersman.”
“Rymolf Stormdrunk? A good man, so long as he’s sober.” She saw more faces 
she knew, and called out to a passing trio, “Uller, Qarl. Where’s your 
brother, Skyte?”
“The Drowned God needed a strong oarsman, I fear,” replied the stocky man 
with the white streak in his beard.“What he means is, Eldiss drank too much wine and his fat belly burst,” 
said the pink-cheeked youth beside him.
“What’s dead may never die,” Esgred said.
“What’s dead may never die.”
Theon muttered the words with them. “You seem well known,” he said to the 
woman when the men had passed on.
“Every man loves the shipwright’s wife. He had better, lest he wants his ship 
to sink. If you need men to pull your oars, you could do worse than those 
three.”
“Lordsport has no lack of strong arms.” Theon had given the matter no little 
thought. It was fighters he wanted, and men who would be loyal to 
him, not to his lord father or his uncles. He was playing the part of 
a dutiful young prince for the moment, while he waited for Lord Balon to reveal 
the fullness of his plans. If it turned out that he did not like those plans or 
his part in them, however, well . . .
“Strength is not enough. A longship’s oars must move as one if you would have 
her best speed. Choose men who have rowed together before, if you’re 
wise.”
“Sage counsel. Perhaps you’d help me choose them.” Let her believe I 
want her wisdom, women fancy that.
“I may. If you treat me kindly.”
“How else?”
Theon quickened his stride as they neared the Myraham, rocking high 
and empty by the quay. Her captain had tried to sail a fortnight past, but Lord 
Balon would not permit it. None of the

merchantmen that called at Lordsport had been allowed to depart again; his 
father wanted no word of the hosting to reach the mainland before he was ready 
to strike.
“Milord,” a plaintive voice called down from the forecastle of the 
merchanter. The captain’s daughter leaned over the rail, gazing after him. Her 
father had forbidden her to come ashore, but whenever Theon came to Lordsport 
he spied her wandering forlornly about the deck. “Milord, a moment,” she 
called after him. “As it please milord . . .”
“Did she?” Esgred asked as Theon hurried her past the cog. “Please 
milord?”
He saw no sense in being coy with this one. “For a time. Now she wants to be 
my salt wife.”
“Oho. Well, she’d profit from some salting, no doubt. Too soft and bland, that 
one. Or am I wrong?”
“You’re not wrong.” Soft and bland. Precisely. How had she 
known?
He had told Wex to wait at the inn. The common room was so crowded that Theon 
had to push his way through the door. Not a seat was to be had at bench
nor table. Nor did he see his squire. “Wex,” he shouted
over the din 
and clatter. If he’s up with one of those
poxy whores, I’ll strip the hide 
off him, he was thinking when he finally spied 
the boy, dicing near the 
hearth . . . and winning too, by the look of the pile of coins 
before him.
“Time to go,” Theon announced. When the boy paid him no mind, he seized him 
by the ear and pulled him from the game. Wex

grabbed up a fistful of coppers and came along without a word. That was one of 
the things Theon liked best about him. Most squires have loose tongues, but Wex 
had been born dumb . . . which didn’t seem to keep him from 
being clever as any twelve-year-old had a right to be. He was a baseborn son of 
one of Lord Botley’s half brothers. Taking him as squire had been part of the 
price Theon had paid for his horse.
When Wex saw Esgred, his eyes went round. You’d think he’d never seen a 
woman before, Theon thought. “Esgred will be riding with me back to Pyke. 
Saddle the horses, and be quick about it.”
The boy had ridden in on a scrawny little garron from Lord Balon’s stable, but 
Theon’s mount was quite another sort of beast. “Where did you find that 
hellhorse?” Esgred asked when she saw him, but from the way she laughed he 
knew she was impressed.
“Lord Botley bought him in Lannisport a year past, but he proved to be too 
much horse for him, so Botley was pleased to sell.” The Iron Islands were too 
sparse and rocky for breeding good horses. Most of the islanders were 
indifferent riders at best, more comfortable on the deck of a longship than in 
the saddle. Even the lords rode garrons or shaggy Harlaw ponies, and ox carts 
were more common than drays. The smallfolk too poor to own either 
one pulled their 
own plows through the thin, stony soil.
But Theon had spent ten years in Winterfell, and did not intend to go to war 
without a good mount beneath him. Lord Botley’s misjudgment was his good 
fortune: a stallion with a temper as black as his hide, larger than a courser 
if not quite so

big as most destriers. As Theon was not quite so big as most knights, that 
suited him admirably. The animal had fire in his eyes. When he’d met his new 
owner, he’d pulled back his lips and tried to bite off his face.
“Does he have a name?” Esgred asked Theon as he mounted.
“Smiler.” He gave her a hand, and pulled her up in front of him, where he 
could put his arms around her as they rode. “I knew a man once who told me 
that I smiled at the wrong things.”
“Do you?”
“Only by the lights of those who smile at nothing.” He thought of his father 
and his uncle Aeron.
“Are you smiling now, my lord prince?”
“Oh, yes.” Theon reached around her to take the reins. She was almost of a 
height with him. Her hair could have used a wash and she had a faded pink scar 
on her pretty neck, but he liked the smell of her, salt and sweat and 
woman.
The ride back to Pyke promised to be a good deal more interesting than the ride 
down had been.
When they were well beyond Lordsport, Theon put a hand on her breast. Esgred 
reached up and plucked it away. “I’d keep both hands on the reins, or this 
black beast of yours is like to fling us both off and kick us to 
death.”
“I broke him of that.” Amused, Theon behaved himself for a while, chatting 
amiably of the weather (grey and overcast, as it had been since he arrived, 
with frequent rains) and telling her of the men he’d killed in the Whispering 
Wood. When he reached the

part about coming that close to the Kingslayer himself, he slid his 
hand back up to where it had been. Her breasts were small, but he liked the 
firmness of them.
“You don’t want to do that, my lord prince.”
“Oh, but I do.” Theon gave her a squeeze.
“Your squire is watching you.”
“Let him. He’ll never speak of it, I swear.”
Esgred pried his fingers off her breast. This time she kept him firmly 
prisoned. She had strong hands.
“I like a woman with a good tight grip.”
She snorted. “I’d not have thought it, by that wench on the 
waterfront.”
“You must not judge me by her. She was the only woman on the ship.”
“Tell me of your father. Will he welcome me kindly to his castle?”
“Why should he? He scarcely welcomed me, his own blood, the heir to 
Pyke and the Iron Islands.”
“Are you?” she asked mildly. “It’s said that you have uncles, brothers, a 
sister.”
“My brothers are long dead, and my sister . . . well, they say 
Asha’s favorite gown is a chainmail hauberk that hangs down past her knees, 
with boiled leather smallclothes beneath. Men’s garb won’t make her a man, 
though. I’ll make a good marriage alliance with her once we’ve won the war, if 
I can find a man to take her. As I recall, she had a nose like a vulture’s 
beak, a ripe crop of

pimples, and no more chest than a boy.”
“You can marry off your sister,” Esgred observed, “but not your 
uncles.”
“My uncles . . .” Theon’s claim took precedence over those of his 
father’s three brothers, but the woman had touched on a sore point nonetheless. 
In the islands it was scarce unheard of for a strong, ambitious uncle to 
dispossess a weak nephew of his rights, and usually murder him in the bargain. 
But I am not weak, Theon told himself, and I mean to be stronger 
yet by the time my father dies. “My uncles pose no threat to me,” he 
declared. “Aeron is drunk on seawater and sanctity. He lives only for his 
god—”
“His god? Not yours?”
“Mine as well. What is dead can never die.” He smiled thinly. “If I make 
pious noises as required, Damphair will give me no trouble. And my uncle 
Victarion—”
“Lord Captain of the Iron Fleet, and a fearsome warrior. I have heard them 
sing of him in the alehouses.”
“During my lord father’s rebellion, he sailed into Lannisport with my uncle 
Euron and burned the Lannister fleet where it lay at anchor,” Theon recalled. 
“The plan was Euron’s, though. Victarion is like some great grey bullock, 
strong and tireless and dutiful, but not like to win any races. No doubt, he’ll 
serve me as loyally as he has served my lord father. He has neither the wits 
nor the ambition to plot betrayal.”
“Euron Croweye has no lack of cunning, though. I’ve heard men say terrible 
things of that one.”Theon shifted his seat. “My uncle Euron has not been seen in the islands 
for close on two years. He may be dead.” If so, it might be for the best. Lord 
Balon’s eldest brother had never given up the Old Way, even for a day. His 
Silence, with its black sails and dark red hull, was infamous in 
every port from Ibben to Asshai, it was said.
“He may be dead,” Esgred agreed, “and if he lives, why, he has spent so long 
at sea, he’d be half a stranger here. The ironborn would never seat a stranger 
in the Seastone Chair.”
“I suppose not,” Theon replied, before it occurred to him that some would 
call him a stranger as well. The thought made him frown. Ten 
years is a long while, but I am back now, and my father is far from dead. I 
have time to prove myself.
He considered fondling Esgred’s breast again, but she would probably only take 
his hand away, and all this talk of his uncles had dampened his ardor somewhat. 
Time enough for such play at the castle, in the privacy of his chambers. “I 
will speak to Helya when we reach Pyke, and see that you have an honored place 
at the feast,” he said. “I must sit on the dais, at my father’s right hand, 
but I will come down and join you when he leaves the hall. He seldom lingers 
long. He has no belly for drink these days.”
“A grievous thing when a great man grows old.”
“Lord Balon is but the father of a great man.”
“A modest lordling.”
“Only a fool humbles himself when the world is so full of men eager to do that 
job for him.” He kissed her lightly on the

nape of her neck.
“What shall I wear to this great feast?” She reached back and pushed his face 
away.
“I’ll ask Helya to garb you. One of my lady mother’s gowns might do. She is 
off on Harlaw, and not expected to return.”
“The cold winds have worn her away, I hear. Will you not go see her? Harlaw is 
only a day’s sail, and surely Lady Greyjoy yearns for a last sight of her 
son.”
“Would that I could. I am kept too busy here. My father relies on me, now that 
I am returned. Come peace, perhaps . . .”
“Your coming might bring her peace.”
“Now you sound a woman,” Theon complained.
“I confess, I am . . . and new with child.”
Somehow that thought excited him. “So you say, but your body shows no signs of 
it. How shall it be proven? Before I believe you, I shall need to see your 
breasts grow ripe, and taste your mother’s milk.”
“And what will my husband say to this? Your father’s own sworn man and 
servant?”
“We’ll give him so many ships to build, he’ll never know you’ve left 
him.”
She laughed. “It’s a cruel lordling who’s seized me. If I promise you that one 
day you may watch my babe get suck, will you tell me more of your war, Theon of 
House Greyjoy? There are miles and mountains still ahead of us, and I would 
hear of this wolf king you served, and the golden lions he fights.”Ever anxious to please her, Theon obliged. The rest of the long ride 
passed swiftly as he filled her pretty head with tales of Winterfell and war. 
Some of the things he said astonished him. She is easy to talk to, gods 
praise her, he reflected. I feel as though I’ve known her for years. 
If the wench’s pillow play is half the equal of her wit, I’ll need to keep 
her . . . He thought of Sigrin the Shipwright, a 
thick-bodied, thick-witted man, flaxen hair already receding from a pimpled 
brow, and shook his head. A waste. A most tragic waste.
It seemed scarcely any time at all before the great curtain wall of Pyke loomed 
up before them.
The gates were open. Theon put his heels into Smiler and rode through at a 
brisk trot. The hounds were barking wildly as he helped Esgred dismount. 
Several came bounding up, tails wagging. They shot straight past him and almost 
bowled the woman over, leaping all around her, yapping and licking. 
“Off,” Theon shouted, aiming an ineffectual kick at one big brown 
bitch, but Esgred was laughing and wrestling with them.
A stableman came pounding up after the dogs. “Take the horse,” Theon 
commanded him, “and get these damn dogs away—”
The lout paid him no mind. His face broke into a huge gap-toothed smile and he 
said, “Lady Asha. You’re back.”
“Last night,” she said. “I sailed from Great Wyk with Lord Goodbrother, and 
spent the night at the inn. My little brother was kind enough to let me ride 
with him from Lordsport.” She kissed one of the dogs on the nose and grinned 
at Theon.All he could do was stand and gape at her. Asha. No. She cannot be 
Asha. He realized suddenly that there were two Ashas in his head. One was 
the little girl he had known. The other, more vaguely imagined, looked 
something like her mother. Neither looked a bit like 
this . . . this . . . this . . .
“The pimples went when the breasts came,” she explained while she tussled 
with a dog, “but I kept the vulture’s beak.”
Theon found his voice. “Why didn’t you tell me?”
Asha let go of the hound and straightened. “I wanted to see who you were 
first. And I did.” She gave him a mocking half bow. “And now, little brother, 
pray
excuse me. I need to bathe and dress for the feast. I wonder if I still 
have that chainmail gown I like to wear over my boiled leather smallclothes?” 
She gave him that evil grin, and crossed the bridge with that walk he’d liked 
so well, half saunter and half sway.
When Theon turned away, Wex was smirking at him. He gave the boy a clout on the 
ear. “That’s for enjoying this so much.” And another, harder. “And that’s 
for not warning me. Next time, grow a tongue.”
His own chambers in the Guest Keep had never seemed so chilly, though the 
thralls had left a brazier burning. Theon kicked his boots off, let his cloak 
fall to the floor, and poured himself a cup of wine, remembering a gawky girl 
with knob knees and pimples. She unlaced my breeches, he thought, 
outraged, and she said . . . oh, gods, and I 
said . . . He groaned. He could not possibly have 
made a more appalling fool of himself.No, he thought then. She was the one who made me a fool. 
The evil bitch must have enjoyed every moment of it. And the way she kept 
reaching for my cock . . .
He took his cup and went to the window seat, where he sat drinking and watching 
the sea while the sun darkened over Pyke. I have no place here, he 
thought, and Asha is the reason, may the Others take her! The water 
below turned from green to grey to black. By then he could hear distant music, 
and he knew it was time to change for the feast.
Theon chose plain boots and plainer clothes, somber shades of black and grey to 
fit his mood. No ornament; he had nothing bought with iron. I might have 
taken something off that wildling I killed to save Bran Stark, but he had 
nothing worth the taking. That’s my cursed luck, I kill the 
poor.
The long smoky hall was crowded with his father’s lords and captains when Theon 
entered, near four hundred of them. Dagmer Cleftjaw had not yet returned from 
Old Wyk with the Stonehouses and Drumms, but all the rest were 
there—Harlaws from Harlaw, Blacktydes from Blacktyde, Sparrs, Merlyns, 
and Goodbrothers from Great Wyk, Saltcliffes and Sunderlies from Saltcliffe, 
and Botleys and Wynches from the other side of Pyke. The thralls were pouring 
ale, and there was music, fiddles and skins and drums. Three burly men were 
doing the finger dance, spinning short-hafted axes at each other. The trick was 
to catch the axe or leap over it without missing a step. It was called the 
finger dance because it usually ended when one of the dancers lost 
one . . . or two, or five.Neither the dancers nor the drinkers took much note of Theon Greyjoy as 
he strode to the dais. Lord Balon occupied the Seastone Chair, carved in the 
shape of a great kraken from an immense block of oily black stone. Legend said 
that the First Men had found it standing on the shore of Old Wyk when they came 
to the Iron Islands. To the left of the high seat were Theon’s uncles. Asha was 
ensconced at his right hand, in the place of honor. “You come late, Theon,” 
Lord Balon observed.
“I ask your pardon.” Theon took the empty seat beside Asha. Leaning close, he 
hissed in her ear, “You’re in my place.”
She turned to him with innocent eyes. “Brother, surely you are mistaken. Your 
place is at Winterfell.” Her smile cut. “And where are all your pretty 
clothes? I heard you fancied silk and velvet against your skin.” She was in 
soft green wool herself, simply cut, the fabric clinging to the slender lines 
of her body.
“Your hauberk must have rusted away, sister,” he threw back. “A great pity. 
I’d like to see you all in iron.”
Asha only laughed. “You may yet, little brother . . . if you 
think your Sea Bitch can keep up with my Black Wind.” One 
of their father’s thralls came near, bearing a flagon of wine. “Are you 
drinking ale or wine tonight, Theon?” She leaned over close. “Or is it still 
a taste of my mother’s milk you thirst for?”
He flushed. “Wine,” he told the thrall. Asha turned away and banged on the 
table, shouting for ale.
Theon hacked a loaf of bread in half, hollowed out a trencher, and summoned a 
cook to fill it with fish stew. The

smell of the thick cream made him a little ill, but he forced himself to eat 
some. He’d drunk enough wine to float him through two meals. If I retch, 
it will be on her. “Does Father know that you’ve married his 
shipwright?” he asked his sister.
“No more than Sigrin does.” She gave a shrug. “Esgred was the 
first ship he built. He named her after his mother. I would be hard-pressed to 
say which he loves best.”
“Every word you spoke to me was a lie.”
“Not every word. Remember when I told you I like to be on top?” 
Asha grinned.
That only made him angrier. “All that about being a woman wed, and new with 
child . . .”
“Oh, that part was true enough.” Asha leapt to her feet. “Rolfe, 
here,” she shouted down at one of the finger dancers, holding up a hand. 
He saw her, spun, and suddenly an axe came flying from his hand, the blade 
gleaming as it tumbled end over end through the torchlight. Theon had time for 
a choked gasp before Asha snatched the axe from the air and slammed it down 
into the table, splitting his trencher in two and splattering his mantle with 
drippings. “There’s my lord husband.” His sister reached down inside her gown 
and drew a dirk from between her breasts. “And here’s my sweet suckling 
babe.”
He could not imagine how he looked at that moment, but suddenly Theon Greyjoy 
realized that the Great Hall was ringing with laughter, all of it at him. Even 
his father was smiling, gods be damned, and his uncle Victarion chuckled aloud. 
The best

response he could summon was a queasy grin. We shall see who is laughing 
when all this is done, bitch.
Asha wrenched the axe out of the table and flung it back down at the dancers, 
to whistles and loud cheers. “You’d do well to heed what I told you about 
choosing a crew.” A thrall offered them a platter, and she stabbed a salted 
fish and ate it off the end of her dirk. “If you had troubled to learn the 
first thing of Sigrin, I could never have fooled you. Ten years a wolf, and you 
land here and think to prince about the islands, but you know nothing and no 
one. Why should men fight and die for you?”
“I am their lawful prince,” Theon said stiffly.
“By the laws of the green lands, you might be. But we make our own laws here, 
or have you forgotten?”
Scowling, Theon turned to contemplate the leaking trencher before him. He would 
have stew in his lap before long. He shouted for a thrall to clean it up. 
Half my life I have waited to come home, and for what? Mockery and 
disregard? This was not the Pyke he remembered. Or did he 
remember? He had been so young when they took him away to hold 
hostage.
The feast was a meager enough thing, a succession of fish stews, black bread, 
and spiceless goat. The tastiest thing Theon found to eat was an onion pie. Ale 
and wine continued to flow well after the last of the courses had been cleared 
away.
Lord Balon Greyjoy rose from the Seastone Chair. “Have done with your drink 
and come to my solar,” he commanded his companions on the dais. “We have 
plans to lay.” He left them with no other

word, flanked by two of his guards. His brothers followed in short order. Theon 
rose to go after them.
“My little brother is in a rush to be off.” Asha raised her drinking horn and 
beckoned for more ale.
“Our lord father is waiting.”
“And has, for many a year. It will do him no harm to wait a little 
longer . . . but if you fear his wrath, scurry after him by all 
means. You ought to have no trouble catching our uncles.” She smiled. “One is 
drunk on seawater, after all, and the other is a great grey bullock so dim 
he’ll probably get lost.”
Theon sat back down, annoyed. “I run after no man.”
“No man, but every woman?”
“It was not me who grabbed your cock.”
“I don’t have one, remember? You grabbed every other bit of me quick 
enough.”
He could feel the flush creeping up his cheeks. “I’m a man with a man’s 
hungers. What sort of unnatural creature are you?”
“Only a shy maid.” Asha’s hand darted out under the table to give his cock a 
squeeze. Theon nearly jumped from his chair. “What, don’t you want me to steer 
you into port, brother?”
“Marriage is not for you,” Theon decided. “When I rule, I believe I will 
pack you off to the silent sisters.” He lurched to his feet and strode off 
unsteadily to find his father.
Rain was falling by the time he reached the swaying bridge out to the Sea 
Tower. His stomach was crashing and churning like the waves below, and wine had 
unsteadied his feet. Theon gritted

his teeth and gripped the rope tightly as he made his way across, pretending 
that it was Asha’s neck he was clutching.
The solar was as damp and drafty as ever. Buried under his sealskin robes, his 
father sat before the brazier with his brothers on either side of him. 
Victarion was talking of tides and winds when Theon entered, but Lord Balon 
waved him silent. “I have made my plans. It is time you heard 
them.”
“I have some suggestions—”
“When I require your counsel I shall ask for it,” his father said. “We have 
had a bird from Old Wyk. Dagmer is bringing the Drumms and Stonehouses. If the 
god grants us good winds, we will sail when they 
arrive . . . or you will. I mean for you to strike 
the first blow, Theon. You shall take eight longships 
north—”
“Eight?” His face reddened. “What can I hope to accomplish with 
only eight longships?”
“You are to harry the Stony Shore, raiding the fishing villages and sinking 
any ships you chance to meet. It may be that you will draw some of the northern 
lords out from behind their stone walls. Aeron will accompany you, and Dagmer 
Cleftjaw.”
“May the Drowned God bless our swords,” the priest said.
Theon felt as if he’d been slapped. He was being sent to do reaver’s work, 
burning fishermen out of their hovels and raping their ugly daughters, and yet 
it seemed Lord Balon did not trust him sufficiently to do even that much. Bad 
enough to have to suffer the Damphair’s scowls and chidings. With Dagmer 
Cleftjaw along as well, his command would be purely nominal.“Asha my daughter,” Lord Balon went on, and Theon turned to see that 
his sister had slipped in silently, “you shall take thirty longships of picked 
men round Sea Dragon Point. Land upon the tidal flats north of Deepwood Motte. 
March quickly, and the castle may fall before they even know you are upon 
them.”
Asha smiled like a cat in cream. “I’ve always wanted a castle,” she said 
sweetly.
“Then take one.”
Theon had to bite his tongue. Deepwood Motte was the stronghold of the Glovers. 
With both Robett and Galbart warring in the south, it would be lightly held, 
and once the castle fell the ironmen would have a secure base in the heart of 
the north. I should be the one sent to take Deepwood. He 
knew Deepwood Motte, he had visited the Glovers several times with 
Eddard Stark.
“Victarion,” Lord Balon said to his brother, “the main thrust shall fall to 
you. When my sons have struck their blows, Winterfell must respond. You should 
meet small opposition as you sail up Saltspear and the Fever River. At the 
headwaters, you will be less than twenty miles from Moat Cailin. The Neck is 
the key to the kingdom. Already we command the western seas. Once we hold Moat 
Cailin, the pup will not be able to win back to the 
north . . . and if he is fool enough to try, his enemies will 
seal the south end of the causeway behind him, and Robb the boy will find 
himself caught like a rat in a bottle.”
Theon could keep silent no longer. “A bold plan, Father, but the lords in 
their castles—”Lord Balon rode over him. “The lords are gone south with the pup. Those 
who remained behind are the cravens, old men, and green boys. They will yield 
or fall, one by one. Winterfell may defy us for a year, but what of it? The 
rest shall be ours, forest and field and hall, and we shall make the folk our 
thralls and salt wives.”
Aeron Damphair raised his arms. “And the waters of wrath will rise high, and 
the Drowned God will spread his dominion across the green lands!”
“What is dead can never die,” Victarion intoned. Lord Balon and Asha echoed 
his words, and Theon had no choice but to mumble along with them. And then it 
was done.
Outside the rain was falling harder than ever. The rope bridge twisted and 
writhed under his feet. Theon Greyjoy stopped in the center of the span and 
contemplated the rocks below. The sound of the waves was a crashing roar, and 
he could taste the salt spray on his lips. A sudden gust of wind made him lose 
his footing, and he stumbled to his knees.
Asha helped him rise. “You can’t hold your wine either, brother.”
Theon leaned on her shoulder and let her guide him across the rain-slick 
boards. “I liked you better when you were Esgred,” he told her 
accusingly.
She laughed. “That’s fair. I liked you better when you were 
nine.”

Theon wiped the spittle off his cheek with the back of his hand. “Robb 
will gut you, Greyjoy,” Benfred Tallheart 
screamed. “He’ll feed your turncloak’s heart to his wolf, you piece of sheep dung.”
Aeron Damphair’s voice cut through the insults like a sword through cheese. 
“Now you must kill him.”
“I have questions for him first,” said Theon.“Fuck your questions.” Benfred hung bleeding and helpless 
between Stygg and Werlag. “You’ll choke on them before you get any answers 
from me, craven. Turncloak.”
Uncle Aeron was relentless. “When he spits on you, he spits on all of us. He 
spits on the Drowned God. He must die.”
“My father gave me the command here, Uncle.”
“And sent me to counsel you.”
And to watch me. Theon dare not push matters too far with his uncle. 
The command was his, yes, but his men had a faith in the Drowned God that they 
did not have in him, and they were terrified of Aeron Damphair. I cannot 
fault them for that.
“You’ll lose your head for this, Greyjoy. The crows will eat the jelly of your 
eyes.” Benfred tried to spit again, but only managed a little blood. “The 
Others bugger your wet god.”
Tallhart, you’ve spit away your life, Theon thought. “Stygg, silence 
him,” he said.They forced Benfred to his knees. Werlag tore the rabbitskin off his belt 
and jammed it between his teeth to stop his shouting. Stygg unlimbered his 
axe.
“No,” Aeron Damphair declared. “He must be given to the god. The old 
way.”
What does it matter? Dead is dead. “Take him, then.”
“You will come as well. You command here. The offering should come from 
you.”
That was more than Theon could stomach. “You are the priest, Uncle, I leave 
the god to you. Do me the same kindness and leave the battles to me.” He waved 
his hand, and Werlag and Stygg began to drag their captive off toward the 
shore. Aeron Damphair gave his nephew a reproachful look, then followed. Down 
to the pebbled beach they would go, to drown Benfred Tallhart in salt water. 
The old way.
Perhaps it’s a kindness, Theon told himself as he stalked off in the 
other direction. Stygg was hardly the most expert of headsmen, and Benfred had 
a neck thick as a boar’s, heavy with muscle and fat. I used to mock him 
for it, just to see how angry I could make him, he remembered. That had 
been, what, three years past? When Ned Stark had ridden to Torrhen’s Square to 
see Ser Helman, Theon had accompanied him and spent a fortnight in Benfred’s 
company.
He could hear the rough noises of victory from the crook in the road where the 
battle had been fought . . . if you’d go so far as to call it a 
battle. More like slaughtering sheep, if truth be

told. Sheep fleeced in steel, but sheep nonetheless.
Climbing a jumble of stone, Theon looked down on the dead men and dying horses. 
The horses had deserved better. Tymor and his brothers had gathered up what 
mounts had come through the fight unhurt, while Urzen and Black Lorren silenced 
the animals too badly wounded to be saved. The rest of his men were looting the 
corpses. Gevin Harlaw knelt on a dead man’s chest, sawing off his finger to get 
at a ring. Paying the iron price. My lord father would approve. Theon 
thought of seeking out the bodies of the two men he’d slain himself to see if 
they had any jewelry worth the taking, but the notion left a bitter taste in 
his mouth. He could imagine what Eddard Stark would have said. Yet that thought 
made him angry too. Stark is dead and rotting, and naught to me, he 
reminded himself.
Old Botley, who was called Fishwhiskers, sat scowling by his pile of plunder 
while his three sons added to it. One of them was in a shoving match with a fat 
man named Todric, who was reeling among the slain with a horn of ale in one 
hand and an axe in the other, clad in a cloak of white foxfur only slightly 
stained by the blood of its previous owner. Drunk, Theon decided, 
watching him bellow. It was said that the ironmen of old had oft been 
blood-drunk in battle, so berserk that they felt no pain and feared no foe, but 
this was a common ale-drunk.
“Wex, my bow and quiver.” The boy ran and fetched them. Theon bent the bow 
and slipped the string into its notches as Todric knocked down the Botley boy 
and flung ale into his eyes.

Fishwhiskers leapt up cursing, but Theon was quicker. He drew on the hand that 
clutched the drinking horn, figuring to give them a shot to talk about, but 
Todric spoiled it by lurching to one side just as he loosed. The arrow took him 
through the belly.
The looters stopped to gape. Theon lowered his bow. “No drunkards, I said, and 
no squabbles over plunder.” On his knees, Todric was dying noisily. “Botley, 
silence him.” Fishwhiskers and his sons were quick to obey. They slit Todric’s 
throat as he kicked feebly, and were stripping him of cloak and rings and 
weapons before he was even dead.
Now they know I mean what I say. Lord Balon might have given him the 
command, but Theon knew that some of his men saw only a soft boy from the green 
lands when they looked at him. “Anyone else have a thirst?” No one replied. 
“Good.” He kicked at Benfred’s fallen banner, clutched in the dead hand of 
the squire who’d borne it. A rabbitskin had been tied below the flag. Why 
rabbitskins? he had meant to ask, but being spat on had made him forget 
his questions. He tossed his bow back to Wex and strode off, remembering how 
elated he’d felt after the Whispering Wood, and wondering why this did not 
taste as sweet. Tallhart, you bloody overproud fool, you never even sent 
out a scout.
They’d been joking and even singing as they’d come on, the three 
trees of Tallhart streaming above them while rabbitskins flapped stupidly from 
the points of their lances. The archers concealed behind the gorse had spoiled 
the song with a rain of arrows, and Theon himself had led his men-at-arms out 
to finish

the butcher’s work with dagger, axe, and warhammer. He had ordered their leader 
spared for questioning.
Only he had not expected it to be Benfred Tallhart.
His limp body was being dragged from the surf when Theon returned to his 
Sea Bitch. The masts of his longships stood outlined against the sky 
along the pebbled beach. Of the fishing village, nothing remained but cold 
ashes that stank when it rained. The men had been put to the sword, all but a 
handful that Theon had allowed to flee to bring the word to Torrhen’s Square. 
Their wives and daughters had been claimed for salt wives, those who were young 
enough and fair. The crones and the ugly ones had simply been raped and killed, 
or taken for thralls if they had useful skills and did not seem likely to cause 
trouble.
Theon had planned that attack as well, bringing his ships up to the shore in 
the chill darkness before the dawn and leaping from the prow with a longaxe in 
his hand to lead his men into the sleeping village. He did not like the taste 
of any of this, but what choice did he have?His thrice-damned sister was sailing her Black Wind north even 
now, sure to win a castle of her own. Lord Balon had let no word of the hosting 
escape the Iron Islands, and Theon’s bloody work along the Stony Shore would be 
put down to sea raiders out for plunder. The northmen would not realize their 
true peril, not until the hammers fell on Deepwood Motte and Moat Cailin. 
And after all is done and won, they will make songs for that bitch Asha, 
and forget that I was even here. That is, if he allowed it.Dagmer Cleftjaw stood by the high carved prow of his longship, 
Foamdrinker. Theon had assigned him the task of guarding the ships; 
otherwise men would have called it Dagmer’s victory, not his. A more prickly 
man might have taken that for a slight, but the Cleftjaw had only 
laughed.
“The day is won,” Dagmer called down. “And yet you do not

smile, boy. The living should smile, for the dead cannot.” He smiled himself 
to show how it was done. It made for a hideous sight. Under a snowy white mane 
of hair, Dagmer Cleftjaw had the most gut-churning scar Theon had ever seen, 
the legacy of the longaxe that had near killed him as a boy. The blow had 
splintered his jaw, shattered his front teeth, and left him four lips where 
other men had but two. A shaggy beard covered his cheeks and neck, but the hair 
would not grow over the scar, so a shiny seam of puckered, twisted flesh 
divided his face like a crevasse through a snowfield. “We could hear them 
singing,” the old warrior said. “It was a good song, and they sang it 
bravely.”
“They sang better than they fought. Harps would have done them as much good as 
their lances did.”
“How many men are lost?”
“Of ours?” Theon shrugged. “Todric. I killed him for getting drunk and 
fighting over loot.”
“Some men are born to be killed.” A lesser man might have been afraid to show 
a smile as frightening as his, yet Dagmer grinned more often and more broadly 
than Lord Balon ever had.
Ugly as it was, that smile brought back a hundred memories. Theon had seen it 
often as a boy, when he’d jumped a horse over a mossy wall, or flung an axe and 
split a target square. He’d seen it when he blocked a blow from Dagmer’s sword, 
when he put an arrow through a seagull on the wing, when he took the tiller in 
hand and guided a longship safely through a snarl of foaming rocks. He 
gave me more smiles than my father and Eddard Stark

together. Even Robb . . . he ought to have won a smile the 
day he’d saved Bran from that wildling, but instead he’d gotten a scolding, as 
if he were some cook who’d burned the stew.
“You and I must talk, Uncle,” Theon said. Dagmer was no true uncle, only a 
sworn man with perhaps a pinch of Greyjoy blood four or five lives back, and 
that from the wrong side of the blanket. Yet Theon had always called him uncle 
nonetheless.
“Come onto my deck, then.” There were no m’lords from Dagmer, not 
when he stood on his own deck. On the Iron Islands, every captain was a king 
aboard his own ship.
He climbed the plank to the deck of the Foamdrinker in four long 
strides, and Dagmer led him back to the cramped aft cabin, where the old man 
poured a horn of sour ale and offered Theon the same. He declined. “We did not 
capture enough horses. A few, but . . . well, I’ll make do with 
what I have, I suppose. Fewer men means more glory.”
“What need do we have of horses?” Like most ironmen, Dagmer preferred to 
fight on foot or from the deck of a ship. “Horses will only shit on our decks 
and get in our way.”
“If we sailed, yes,” Theon admitted. “I have another plan.” He watched the 
other carefully to see how he would take that. Without the Cleftjaw he could 
not hope to succeed. Command or no, the men would never follow him if both 
Aeron and Dagmer opposed him, and he had no hope of winning over the sour-faced 
priest.
“Your lord father commanded us to harry the coast, no more.” Eyes pale as sea 
foam watched Theon from under those shaggy white

eyebrows. Was it disapproval he saw there, or a spark of interest? The latter, 
he thought . . . hoped . . .
“You are my father’s man.”
“His best man, and always have been.”
Pride, Theon thought. He is proud, I must use that, his pride 
will be the key. “There is no man in the Iron Islands half so skilled 
with spear or sword.”
“You have been too long away, boy. When you left, it was as you say, but I am 
grown old in Lord Greyjoy’s service. The singers call Andrik best now. Andrik 
the Unsmiling, they name him. A giant of a man. He serves Lord Drumm of Old 
Wyk. And Black Lorren and Qarl the Maid are near as dread.”
“This Andrik may be a great fighter, but men do not fear him as they fear 
you.”
“Aye, that’s so,” Dagmer said. The fingers curled around the drinking horn 
were heavy with rings, gold and silver and bronze, set with chunks of sapphire 
and garnet and dragonglass. He had paid the iron price for every one, Theon 
knew.
“If I had a man like you in my service, I should not waste him on this child’s 
business of harrying and burning. This is no work for Lord Balon’s best 
man . . .”
Dagmer’s grin twisted his lips apart and showed the brown splinters of his 
teeth. “Nor for his trueborn son?” He hooted. “I know you too well, Theon. I 
saw you take your first step, helped you bend your first bow. ‘Tis not me who 
feels wasted.”
“By rights I should have my sister’s command,” he admitted,

uncomfortably aware of how peevish that sounded.
“You take this business too hard, boy. It is only that your lord father does 
not know you. With your brothers dead and you taken by the wolves, your sister 
was his solace. He learned to rely on her, and she has never failed 
him.”
“Nor have I. The Starks knew my worth. I was one of Brynden Blackfish’s picked 
scouts, and I charged with the first wave in the Whispering Wood. I was 
that close to crossing swords with the Kingslayer himself.” Theon 
held his hands two feet apart. “Daryn Hornwood came between us, and died for 
it.”
“Why do you tell me this?” Dagmer asked. “It was me who put your first sword 
in your hand. I know you are no craven.”
“Does my father?”
The hoary old warrior looked as if he had bitten into something he did not like 
the taste of. “It is only . . . Theon, the Boy Wolf is your 
friend, and these Starks had you for ten years.”
“I am no Stark.” Lord Eddard saw to that. “I am a Greyjoy, and I 
mean to be my father’s heir. How can I do that unless I prove myself with some 
great deed?”
“You are young. Other wars will come, and you shall do your great deeds. For 
now, we are commanded to harry the Stony Shore.”
“Let my uncle Aeron see to it. I’ll give him six ships, all but 
Foamdrinker and Sea Bitch, and he can burn and drown to his 
god’s surfeit.”
“The command was given you, not Aeron Damphair.”
“So long as the harrying is done, what does it matter? No

priest could do what I mean to, nor what I ask of you. I have a task that only 
Dagmer Cleftjaw can accomplish.”
Dagmer took a long draught from his horn. “Tell me.”
He is tempted, Theon thought. He likes this reaver’s work no 
better than I do. “If my sister can take a castle, so can I.”
“Asha has four or five times the men we do.”
Theon allowed himself a sly smile. “But we have four times the wits, and five 
times the courage.”
“Your father—”
“—will thank me, when I hand him his kingdom. I mean to do a deed that 
the harpers will sing of for a thousand years.”
He knew that would give Dagmer pause. A singer had made a song about the axe 
that cracked his jaw in half, and the old man loved to hear it. Whenever he was 
in his cups he would call for a reaving song, something loud and stormy that 
told of dead heroes and deeds of wild valor. His hair is white and his 
teeth are rotten, but he still has a taste for glory.
“What would my part be in this scheme of yours, boy?” Dagmer Cleftjaw asked 
after a long silence, and Theon knew he had won.
“To strike terror into the heart of the foe, as only one of your name could 
do. You’ll take the great part of our force and march on Torrhen’s Square. 
Helman Tallhart took his best men south, and Benfred died here with their sons. 
His uncle Leobald will remain, with some small garrison.” If I had been 
able to question Benfred, I would know just how small. “Make no secret of 
your approach. Sing all the brave songs you like. I want them to

close their gates.”
“Is this Torrhen’s Square a strong keep?”
“Strong enough. The walls are stone, thirty feet high, with square towers at 
each corner and a square keep within.”
“Stone walls cannot be fired. How are we to take them? We do not have the 
numbers to storm even a small castle.”
“You will make camp outside their walls and set to building catapults and 
siege engines.”
“That is not the Old Way. Have you forgotten? Ironmen fight with swords and 
axes, not by flinging rocks. There is no glory in starving out a 
foeman.”
“Leobald will not know that. When he sees you raising siege towers, his old 
woman’s blood will run cold, and he will bleat for help. Stay your archers, 
Uncle, and let the raven fly. The castellan at Winterfell is a brave man, but 
age has stiffened his wits as well as his limbs. When he learns that one of his 
king’s bannermen is under attack by the fearsome Dagmer Cleftjaw, he will 
summon his strength and ride to Tallhart’s aid. It is his duty. Ser Rodrik is 
nothing if not dutiful.”
“Any force he summons will be larger than mine,” Dagmer said, “and these old 
knights are more cunning than you think, or they would never have lived to see 
their first grey hair. You set us a battle we cannot hope to win, Theon. This 
Torrhen’s Square will never fall.”
Theon smiled. “It’s not Torrhen’s Square I mean to take.”

One moment he was asleep; the next, awake.
Kyra nestled against him, one arm draped lightly over his, her breasts brushing 
his back. He could hear her breathing, soft and steady. The sheet was tangled 
about them. It was the black of night. The bedchamber was dark and 
still.
What is it? Did I hear something? Someone?
Wind sighed faintly against the shutters. Somewhere, far off, he heard the yowl 
of a cat in heat. Nothing else. Sleep, Greyjoy, he told himself. 
The castle is quiet, and you have guards posted. At your door, at the 
gates, on the armory.He might have put it down to a bad dream, but he did not remember 
dreaming. Kyra had worn him out. Until Theon had sent for her, she had lived 
all of her eighteen years in the winter town without ever setting foot inside 
the walls of the castle. She came to him wet and eager and lithe as a weasel, 
and there had been a certain undeniable spice to fucking a common tavern wench 
in Lord Eddard Stark’s own bed.
She murmured sleepily as Theon slid out from under her arm and got to his feet. 
A few embers still smoldered in the hearth. Wex slept on the floor at the foot 
of the bed, rolled up inside his cloak and dead to the world. Nothing moved. 
Theon crossed to the window and threw open the shutters. Night touched him with

cold fingers, and gooseprickles rose on his bare skin. He leaned against the 
stone sill and looked out on dark towers, empty yards, black sky, and more 
stars than a man could ever count if he lived to be a hundred. A half-moon 
floated above the Bell Tower and cast its reflection on the roof of the glass 
gardens. He heard no alarums, no voices, not so much as a footfall.
All’s well, Greyjoy. Hear the quiet? You ought to be drunk with joy. You 
took Winterfell with fewer than thirty men, a feat to sing of. Theon 
started back to bed. He’d roll Kyra on her back and fuck her again, that ought 
to banish these phantoms. Her gasps and giggles would make a welcome respite 
from this silence.
He stopped. He had grown so used to the howling of the direwolves that he 
scarcely heard it anymore . . . but some part of him, some 
hunter’s instinct, heard its absence.
Urzen stood outside his door, a sinewy man with a round shield slung over his 
back. “The wolves are quiet,” Theon told him. “Go see what they’re doing, 
and come straight back.” The thought of the direwolves running loose gave him 
a queasy feeling. He remembered the day in the wolfswood when the wildlings had 
attacked Bran. Summer and Grey Wind had torn them to pieces.
When he prodded Wex with the toe of his boot, the boy sat up and rubbed his 
eyes. “Make certain Bran Stark and his little brother are in their beds, and 
be quick about it.”
“M’lord?” Kyra called sleepily.
“Go back to sleep, this does not concern you.” Theon poured himself a cup of 
wine and drank it down. All the time he was

listening, hoping to hear a howl. Too few men, he thought sourly. 
I have too few men. If Asha does not come . . .
Wex returned the quickest, shaking his head side to side. Cursing, Theon found 
his tunic and breeches on the floor where he had dropped them in his haste to 
get at Kyra. Over the tunic he donned a jerkin of iron-studded leather, and he 
belted a longsword and dagger at his waist. His hair was wild as the wood, but 
he had larger concerns.
By then Urzen was back. “The wolves be gone.”
Theon told himself he must be as cold and deliberate as Lord Eddard. “Rouse 
the castle,” he said. “Herd them out into the yard, everyone, we’ll see who’s 
missing. And have Lorren make a round of the gates. Wex, with me.”
He wondered if Stygg had reached Deepwood Motte yet. The man was not as skilled 
a rider as he claimed—none of the ironmen were much good in the 
saddle—but there’d been time enough. Asha might well be on her way. 
And if she learns that I have lost the 
Starks . . . It did not bear thinking about.
Bran’s bedchamber was empty, as was Rickon’s half a turn below. Theon cursed 
himself. He should have kept a guard on them, but he’d deemed it more important 
to have men walking the walls and protecting the gates than to nursemaid a 
couple of children, one a cripple.
Outside he heard sobbing as the castle folk were pulled from their beds and 
driven into the yard. I’ll give them reason to sob. I’ve used them gently, 
and this is how they repay me. He’d

even had two of his own men whipped bloody for raping that kennel girl, to show 
them he meant to be just. They still blame me for the rape, though. And 
the rest. He deemed that unfair. Mikken had killed himself with his mouth, 
just as Benfred had. As for Chayle, he had to give someone to the 
Drowned God, his men expected it. “I bear you no ill will,” he’d told the 
septon before they threw him down the well, “but you and your gods have no 
place here now.” You’d think the others might be grateful he hadn’t chosen one 
of them, but no. He wondered how many of them were part of this plot against 
him.
Urzen returned with Black Lorren. “The Hunter’s Gate,” Lorren said. “Best 
come see.”
The Hunter’s Gate was conveniently sited close to the kennels and kitchens. It 
opened directly on fields and forests, allowing riders to come and go without 
first passing through the winter town, and so was favored by hunting parties. 
“Who had the guard here?” Theon demanded.
“Drennan and Squint.”
Drennan was one of the men who’d raped Palla. “If they’ve let the boys escape, 
I’ll have more than a little skin off their back this time, I swear 
it.”
“No need for that,” Black Lorren said curtly.
Nor was there. They found Squint floating facedown in the moat, his entrails 
drifting behind him like a nest of pale snakes. Drennan lay half-naked in the 
gatehouse, in the snug room where the drawbridge was worked. His throat had 
been opened ear to ear.

A ragged tunic concealed the half-healed scars on his back, but his boots were 
scattered amidst the rushes, and his breeches tangled about his feet. There was 
cheese on a small table near the door, beside an empty flagon. And two 
cups.
Theon picked one up and sniffed at the dregs of wine in the bottom. “Squint 
was up on the wallwalk, no?”
“Aye,” said Lorren.
Theon flung the cup into the hearth. “I’d say Drennan was pulling down his 
breeches to stick it in the woman when she stuck it in him. His own cheese 
knife, by the look of it. Someone find a pike and fish the other fool out of 
the moat.”
The other fool was in a deal worse shape than Drennan. When Black Lorren drew 
him out of the water, they saw that one of his arms had been wrenched off at 
the elbow, half of his neck was missing, and there was a ragged hole where his 
navel and groin once had been. The pike tore through his bowels as Lorren was 
pulling him in. The stench was awful.
“The direwolves,” Theon said. “Both of them, at a guess.” Disgusted, he 
walked back to the drawbridge. Winterfell was encircled by two massive granite 
walls, with a wide moat between them. The outer wall stood eighty feet high, 
the inner more than a hundred. Lacking men, Theon had been forced to abandon 
the outer defenses and post his guards along the higher inner walls. He dared 
not risk having them on the wrong side of the moat should the castle rise 
against him.
There had to be two or more, he decided. While the woman

was entertaining Drennan, the others freed the wolves.
Theon called for a torch and led them up the steps to the wallwalk. He swept 
the flame low before him, looking for . . . there. On 
the inside of the rampart and in the wide crenel between two upthrust merlons. 
“Blood,” he announced, “clumsily mopped up. At a guess, the woman killed 
Drennan and lowered the drawbridge. Squint heard the clank of chains, came to 
have a look, and got this far. They pushed the corpse through the crenel into 
the moat so he wouldn’t be found by another sentry.”
Urzen peered along the walls. “The other watch turrets are not far. I see 
torches burning—”
“Torches, but no guards,” Theon said testily. “Winterfell has more turrets 
than I have men.”
“Four guards at the main gate,” said Black Lorren, “and five walking the 
walls beside Squint.”
Urzen said, “If he had sounded his horn—”
I am served by fools. “Try and imagine it was you up here, Urzen. 
It’s dark and cold. You have been walking sentry for hours, looking forward to 
the end of your watch. Then you hear a noise and move toward the gate, and 
suddenly you see eyes at the top of the stair, glowing green and gold 
in the torchlight. Two shadows come rushing toward you faster than you can 
believe. You catch a glimpse of teeth, start to level your spear, and they 
slam into you and open your belly, tearing through leather as if it 
were cheesecloth.” He gave Urzen a hard shove. “And now you’re down on your 
back, your guts are spilling out, and one of them has

his teeth around your neck.” Theon grabbed the man’s scrawny throat, tightened 
his fingers, and smiled. “Tell me, at what moment during all of this do you 
stop to blow your fucking horn?” He shoved Urzen away roughly, 
sending him stumbling back against a merlon. The man rubbed his throat. I 
should have had those beasts put down the day we took the castle, he 
thought angrily. I’d seen them kill, I knew how dangerous they 
were.
“We must go after them,” Black Lorren said.
“Not in the dark.” Theon did not relish the idea of chasing direwolves 
through the wood by night; the hunters could easily become the hunted. “We’ll 
wait for daylight. Until then, I had best go speak with my loyal 
subjects.”
Down in the yard, an uneasy crowd of men, women, and children had been pushed up 
against the wall. Many had not been given time to dress; they covered 
themselves with woolen blankets, or huddled naked under cloaks or bedrobes. A 
dozen ironmen hemmed them in, torches in one hand and weapons in the other. The 
wind was gusting, and the flickering orange light reflected dully off steel 
helms, thick beards, and unsmiling eyes.
Theon walked up and down before the prisoners, studying the faces. 
They all looked guilty to him. “How many are missing?”
“Six.” Reek stepped up behind him, smelling of soap, his long hair moving in 
the wind. “Both Starks, that bog boy and his sister, the halfwit from the 
stables, and your wildling woman.”
Osha. He had suspected her from the moment he saw that

second cup. I should have known better than to trust that one. She’s as 
unnatural as Asha. Even their names sound alike.
“Has anyone had a look at the stables?”
“Aggar says no horses are missing.”
“Dancer is still in his stall?”
“Dancer?” Reek frowned. “Aggar says the horses are all there. Only the 
halfwit is missing.”
They’re afoot, then. That was the best news he’d heard since he woke. 
Bran would be riding in his basket on Hodor’s back, no doubt. Osha would need 
to carry Rickon; his little legs wouldn’t take him far on their own. Theon was 
confident that he’d soon have them back in his hands. “Bran and Rickon have 
fled,” he told the castle folk, watching their eyes. “Who knows where they’ve 
gone?” No one answered. “They could not have escaped without help,” Theon 
went on. “Without food, clothing, weapons.” He had locked away every sword 
and axe in Winterfell, but no doubt some had been hidden from him. “I’ll have 
the names of all those who aided them. All those who turned a blind eye.” The 
only sound was the wind. “Come first light, I mean to bring them back.” He 
hooked his thumbs through his swordbelt. “I need huntsmen. Who wants a nice 
warm wolfskin to see them through the winter? Gage?” The cook had always 
greeted him cheerfully when he returned from the hunt, to ask whether he’d 
brought anything choice for the table, but he had nothing to say now. Theon 
walked back the way he had come, searching their faces for the least sign of 
guilty knowledge. “The wild is no place for a cripple. And

Rickon, young as he is, how long will he last out there? Nan, think how 
frightened he must be.” The old woman had nattered at him for ten years, 
telling her endless stories, but now she gaped at him as if he were some 
stranger. “I might have killed every man of you and given your women to my 
soldiers for their pleasure, but instead I protected you. Is this the thanks 
you offer?” Joseth who’d groomed his horses, Farlen who’d taught him all he 
knew of hounds, Barth the brewer’s wife who’d been his first—not one of 
them would meet his eyes. They hate me, he realized.
Reek stepped close. “Strip off their skins,” he urged, his thick lips 
glistening. “Lord Bolton, he used to say a naked man has few secrets, but a 
flayed man’s got none.”
The flayed man was the sigil of House Bolton, Theon knew; ages past, certain of 
their lords had gone so far as to cloak themselves in the skins of dead 
enemies. A number of Starks had ended thus. Supposedly all that had stopped a 
thousand years ago, when the Boltons had bent their knees to Winterfell. 
Or so they say, but old ways die hard, as well I know.
“There will be no flaying in the north so long as I rule in Winterfell,” 
Theon said loudly. I am your only protection against the likes of 
him, he wanted to scream. He could not be that blatant, but perhaps some 
were clever enough to take the lesson.
The sky was greying over the castle walls. Dawn could not be far off. “Joseth, 
saddle Smiler and a horse for yourself. Murch, Gariss, Poxy Tym, you’ll come as 
well.” Murch and Gariss were the best huntsmen in the castle, and Tym was a 
fine bowman.

“Aggar, Rednose, Gelmarr, Reek, Wex.” He needed his own to watch his back. 
“Farlen, I’ll want hounds, and you to handle them.”
The grizzled kennelmaster crossed his arms. “And why would I care to hunt down 
my own trueborn lords, and babes at that?”
Theon moved close. “I am your trueborn lord now, and the man who keeps Palla 
safe.”
He saw the defiance die in Farlen’s eyes. “Aye, m’lord.”
Stepping back, Theon glanced about to see who else he might add. “Maester 
Luwin,” he announced.
“I know nothing of hunting.”
No, but I don’t trust you in the castle in my absence. “Then it’s 
past time you learned.”
“Let me come too. I want that wolfskin cloak.” A boy stepped forward, no 
older than Bran. It took Theon a moment to remember him. “I’ve hunted lots of 
times before,” Walder Frey said. “Red deer and elk, and even 
boar.”
His cousin laughed at him. “He rode on a boar hunt with his father, but they 
never let him near the boar.”
Theon look at the boy doubtfully. “Come if you like, but if you can’t keep up, 
don’t think that I’ll nurse you along.” He turned back to Black Lorren. 
“Winterfell is yours in my absence. If we do not return, do with it as you 
will.” That bloody well ought to have them praying for my 
success.
They assembled by the Hunter’s Gate as the first pale rays of the sun brushed 
the top of the Bell Tower, their breath frosting in the cold morning air. 
Gelmarr had equipped himself

with a longaxe whose reach would allow him to strike before the wolves were on 
him. The blade was heavy enough to kill with a single blow. Aggar wore steel 
greaves. Reek arrived carrying a boar spear and an overstuffed washerwoman’s 
sack bulging with god knows what. Theon had his bow; he needed nothing else. 
Once he had saved Bran’s life with an arrow. He hoped he would not need to take 
it with another, but if it came to that, he would.
Eleven men, two boys, and a dozen dogs crossed the moat. Beyond the outer wall, 
the tracks were plain to read in the soft ground; the pawprints of the wolves, 
Hodor’s heavy tread, the shallower marks left by the feet of the two Reeds. 
Once under the trees, the stony ground and fallen leaves made the trail harder 
to see, but by then Farlen’s red bitch had the scent. The rest of the dogs were 
close behind, the hounds sniffing and barking, a pair of monstrous mastiffs 
bringing up the rear. Their size and ferocity might make the difference against 
a cornered direwolf.
He’d have guessed that Osha might run south to Ser Rodrik, but the trail led 
north by northwest, into the very heart of the wolfswood. Theon did not like 
that one bit. It would be a bitter irony if the Starks made for Deepwood Motte 
and delivered themselves right into Asha’s hands. I’d sooner have them 
dead, he thought bitterly. It is better to be seen as cruel than 
foolish.
Wisps of pale mist threaded between the trees. Sentinels and soldier pines grew 
thick about here, and there was nothing as dark and gloomy as an evergreen 
forest. The ground was uneven, and the fallen needles disguised the softness of 
the turf and made

the footing treacherous for the horses, so they had to go slowly. Not as 
slowly as a man carrying a cripple, though, or a bony harridan with a 
four-year-old on her back. He told himself to be patient. He’d have them 
before the day was out.
Maester Luwin trotted up to him as they were following a game trail along the 
lip of a ravine. “Thus far hunting seems indistinguishable from riding through 
the woods, my lord.”
Theon smiled. “There are similarities. But with hunting, there’s blood at the 
end.”
“Must it be so? This flight was great folly, but will you not be merciful? 
These are your foster brothers we seek.”
“No Stark but Robb was ever brotherly toward me, but Bran and Rickon have more 
value to me living than dead.”
“The same is true of the Reeds. Moat Cailin sits on the edge of the bogs. Lord 
Howland can make your uncle’s occupation a visit to hell if he chooses, but so 
long as you hold his heirs he must stay his hand.”
Theon had not considered that. In truth, he had scarcely considered the mudmen 
at all, beyond eyeing Meera once or twice and wondering if she was still a 
maiden. “You may be right. We will spare them if we can.”
“And Hodor too, I hope. The boy is simple, you know that. He does as he is 
told. How many times has he groomed your horse, soaped your saddle, scoured 
your mail?”
Hodor was nothing to him. “If he does not fight us, we will let him live.” 
Theon pointed a finger. “But say one word about

sparing the wildling, and you can die with her. She swore me an oath, and 
pissed on it.”
The maester inclined his head. “I make no apologies for oathbreakers. Do what 
you must. I thank you for your mercy.”
Mercy, thought Theon as Luwin dropped back. There’s a bloody 
trap. Too much and they call you weak, too little and you’re monstrous. 
Yet the maester had given him good counsel, he knew. His father thought only in 
terms of conquest, but what good was it to take a kingdom if you could not hold 
it? Force and fear could carry you only so far. A pity Ned Stark had taken his 
daughters south; elsewise Theon could have tightened his grip on Winterfell by 
marrying one of them. Sansa was a pretty little thing too, and by now likely 
even ripe for bedding. But she was a thousand leagues away, in the clutches of 
the Lannisters. A shame.
The wood grew ever wilder. The pines and sentinels gave way to huge dark oaks. 
Tangles of hawthorn concealed treacherous gullies and cuts. Stony hills rose 
and fell. They passed a crofter’s cottage, deserted and overgown, and skirted a 
flooded quarry where the still water had a sheen as grey as steel. When the 
dogs began to bay, Theon figured the fugitives were near at hand. He spurred 
Smiler and followed at a trot, but what he found was only the carcass of a 
young elk . . . or what remained of it.
He dismounted for a closer look. The kill was still fresh, and plainly the work 
of wolves. The dogs sniffed round it eagerly, and one of the mastiffs buried 
his teeth in a haunch until Farlen shouted him off. No part of this animal 
has been

butchered, Theon realized. The wolves ate, but not the men. Even 
if Osha did not want to risk a fire, she ought to have cut them a few steaks. 
It made no sense to leave so much good meat to rot. “Farlen, are you certain 
we’re on the right trail?” he demanded. “Could your dogs be chasing the wrong 
wolves?”
“My bitch knows the smell of Summer and Shaggy well enough.”
“I hope so. For your sake.”
Less than an hour later, the trail led down a slope toward a muddy brook 
swollen by the recent rains. It was there the dogs lost the scent. Farlen and 
Wex waded across with the hounds and came back shaking their heads while the 
animals ranged up and down the far bank, sniffing. “They went in here, m’lord, 
but I can’t see where they come out,” the kennelmaster said.
Theon dismounted and knelt beside the stream. He dipped a hand in it. The water 
was cold. “They won’t have stayed long in this,” he said. “Take half the 
dogs downstream, I’ll go up—”
Wex clapped his hands together loudly.
“What is it?” Theon said.
The mute boy pointed.
The ground near the water was sodden and muddy. The tracks the wolves had left 
were plain enough. “Pawprints, yes. So?”
Wex drove his heel into the mud, and pivoted his foot this way and that. It 
left a deep gouge.
Joseth understood. “A man the size of Hodor ought to have left a deep print in 
this mud,” he said. “More so with the weight of a boy on his back. Yet the 
only boot prints here are our own.

See for yourself.”
Appalled, Theon saw it was true. The wolves had gone into the turgid brown 
water alone. “Osha must have turned aside back of us. Before the elk, most 
likely. She sent the wolves on by themselves, hoping we’d chase after them.” 
He rounded on his huntsmen. “If you two have played me 
false—”
“There’s been only the one trail, my lord, I swear it,” said Gariss 
defensively. “And the direwolves would never have parted from them boys. Not 
for long.”
That’s so, Theon thought. Summer and Shaggydog might have gone off to 
hunt, but soon or late they would return to Bran and Rickon. “Gariss, Murch, 
take four dogs and double back, find where we lost them. Aggar, you watch them, 
I’ll have no trickery. Farlen and I will follow the direwolves. Give a blast on 
the horn when you pick up the trail. Two blasts if you catch sight of the 
beasts themselves. Once we find where they went, they’ll lead us back to their 
masters.”
He took Wex, the Frey boy, and Gynir Rednose to search upstream. He and Wex 
rode on one side of the brook, Rednose and Walder Frey on the other, each with 
a pair of hounds. The wolves might have come out on either bank. Theon kept an 
eye out for tracks, spoor, broken branches, any hint as to where the direwolves 
might have left the water. He spied the prints of deer, elk, and badger easily 
enough. Wex surprised a vixen drinking at the stream, and Walder flushed three 
rabbits from the underbrush and managed to put an arrow in one. They saw the 
claw marks where a

bear had shredded the bark of a tall birch. But of the direwolves there was no 
sign.
A little farther, Theon told himself. Past that oak, over that 
rise, past the next bend of the stream, we’ll find something there. He 
pressed on long after he knew he should turn back, a growing sense of anxiety 
gnawing at his belly. It was midday when he wrenched Smiler’s head round in 
disgust and gave up.
Somehow Osha and the wretched boys were eluding him. It should not have been 
possible, not on foot, burdened with a cripple and a young child. Every passing 
hour increased the likelihood that they would make good their escape. If 
they reach a village . . . The people of the north would 
never deny Ned Stark’s sons, Robb’s brothers. They’d have mounts to speed them 
on their way, food. Men would fight for the honor of protecting them. The whole 
bloody north would rally around them.
The wolves went downstream, that’s all. He clung to that thought. 
That red bitch will sniff where they came out of the water and we’ll be 
after them again.
But when they joined up with Farlen’s party, one look at the kennelmaster’s 
face smashed all of Theon’s hopes to shards. “The only thing those dogs are 
fit for is a bear baiting,” he said angrily. “Would that I had a 
bear.”
“The dogs are not at fault.” Farlen knelt between a mastiff and his precious 
red bitch, a hand on each. “Running water don’t hold no scents, 
m’lord.”
“The wolves had to come out of the stream somewhere.”“No doubt they did. Upstream or down. We keep on, we’ll find the place, 
but which way?”
“I never knew a wolf to run up a streambed for miles,” said Reek. “A man 
might. If he knew he was being hunted, he might. But a wolf?”
Yet Theon wondered. These beasts were not as other wolves. I should have 
skinned the cursed things.
It was the same tale all over again when they rejoined Gariss, Murch, and 
Aggar. The huntsmen had retraced their steps halfway to Winterfell without 
finding any sign of where the Starks might have parted company with the 
direwolves. Farlen’s hounds seemed as frustrated as their masters, sniffing 
forlornly at trees and rocks and snapping irritably at each other.
Theon dared not admit defeat. “We’ll return to the brook. Search again. This 
time we’ll go as far as we must.”
“We won’t find them,” the Frey boy said suddenly. “Not so long as the 
frogeaters are with them. Mudmen are sneaks, they won’t fight like decent 
folks, they skulk and use poison arrows. You never see them, but they see you. 
Those who go into the bogs after them get lost and never come out. Their houses 
move, even the castles like Greywater Watch.” He glanced nervously 
at greenery that encircled them on all sides. “They might be out there right 
now, listening to everything we say.”
Farlen laughed to show what he thought of that notion. “My dogs would smell 
anything in them bushes. Be all over them before you could break wind, 
boy.”“Frogeaters don’t smell like men,” Frey insisted. “They have a boggy 
stink, like frogs and trees and scummy water. Moss grows under their arms in 
place of hair, and they can live with nothing to eat but mud and breathe 
swamp water.”
Theon was about to tell him what he ought to do with his wet nurse’s fable when 
Maester Luwin spoke up. “The histories say the crannogmen grew close to the 
children of the forest in the days when the greenseers tried to bring the 
hammer of the waters down upon the Neck. It may be that they have secret 
knowledge.”
Suddenly the wood seemed a deal darker than it had a moment before, as if a 
cloud had passed before the sun. It was one thing to have some fool boy 
spouting folly, but maesters were supposed to be wise. “The only children that 
concern me are Bran and Rickon,” Theon said. “Back to the stream. 
Now.”
For a moment he did not think they were going to obey, but in the end old habit 
asserted itself. They followed sullenly, but they followed. The Frey boy was as 
jumpy as those rabbits he’d flushed earlier. Theon put men on either bank and 
followed the current. They rode for miles, going slow and careful, dismounting 
to lead the horses over treacherous ground, letting the good-for-bear-bait 
hounds sniff at every bush. Where a fallen tree dammed the flow, the hunters 
were forced to loop around a deep green pool, but if the direwolves had done 
the same they’d left neither print nor spoor. The beasts had taken to swimming, 
it seemed. When I catch them, they’ll have all the swimming they can 
stomach. I’ll give them both to the Drowned God.
When the woods began to darken, Theon Greyjoy knew he was beaten. Either 
the crannogmen did know the magic of the children of the forest, or 
else Osha had deceived them with some wildling trick. He made them press on 
through the dusk, but when the last light faded Joseth finally worked up the 
courage to say, “This is fruitless, my lord. We will lame a horse, break a 
leg.”
“Joseth has the right of it,” said Maester Luwin. “Groping through the woods 
by torchlight will avail us nothing.”
Theon could taste bile at the back of his throat, and his stomach was a nest of 
snakes twining and snapping at each other. If he crept back to Winterfell 
empty-handed, he might as well dress in motley henceforth and wear a pointed 
hat; the whole north would know him for a fool. And when my father hears, 
and Asha . . .
“M’lord prince.” Reek urged his horse near. “Might be them Starks never came 
this way. If I was them, I would have gone north and east, maybe. To the 
Umbers. Good Stark men, they are. But their lands are a long way. The boys will 
shelter someplace nearer. Might be I know where.”
Theon looked at him suspiciously. “Tell me.”
“You know that old mill, sitting lonely on the Acorn Water? We stopped there 
when I was being dragged to Winterfell a captive. The miller’s wife sold us hay 
for our horses while that old knight clucked over her brats. Might be the 
Starks are hiding there.”
Theon knew the mill. He had even tumbled the miller’s wife a time or two. There 
was nothing special about it, or her. “Why there? There are a dozen villages 
and holdfasts just as close.”Amusement shone in those pale eyes. “Why? Now that’s past knowing. But 
they’re there, I have a feeling.”
He was growing sick of the man’s sly answers. His lips look like two worms 
fucking. “What are you saying? If you’ve kept some knowledge from 
me—”
“M’lord prince?” Reek dismounted, and beckoned Theon to do the same. When 
they were both afoot, he pulled open the cloth sack he’d fetched from 
Winterfell. “Have a look here.”
It was growing hard to see. Theon thrust his hand into the sack impatiently, 
groping amongst soft fur and rough scratchy wool. A sharp point pricked his 
skin, and his fingers closed around something cold and hard. He drew out a 
wolf’s-head brooch, silver and jet. Understanding came suddenly. His hand 
closed into a fist. “Gelmarr,” he said, wondering whom he could trust. 
None of them. “Aggar. Rednose. With us. The rest of you may return 
to Winterfell with the hounds. I’ll have no further need of them. I know where 
Bran and Rickon are hiding now.”
“Prince Theon,” Maester Luwin entreated, “you will remember your promise? 
Mercy, you said.”
“Mercy was for this morning,” said Theon. It is better to be feared than 
laughed at. “Before they made me angry.”

The sky was a gloom of cloud, the woods dead and frozen. Roots grabbed at 
Theon’s feet as he ran, and bare branches lashed his face, leaving thin stripes 
of blood across his cheeks. He crashed through heedless, breathless, icicles 
flying to pieces before him. Mercy, he sobbed. From behind came a 
shuddering howl that curdled his blood. Mercy, mercy. When he glanced 
back over his shoulder he saw them coming, great wolves the size of horses with 
the heads of small children. Oh, mercy, mercy. Blood dripped from 
their mouths black as pitch, burning holes in the snow where it fell. Every 
stride brought them closer. Theon tried to run faster, but his legs would not 
obey. The trees all had faces, and they were laughing at him, laughing, and the 
howl came again. He could smell the hot breath of the beasts behind him, a 
stink of brimstone and corruption. They’re dead, dead, I saw them 
killed, he tried to shout, I saw their heads dipped in tar, but 
when he opened his mouth only a moan emerged, and then something 
touched him and he whirled, shouting . . .. . . flailing for the dagger he kept by his bedside and 
managing only to knock it to the floor. Wex danced away from him. Reek stood 
behind the mute, his face lit from below by the candle he carried. “What?” 
Theon cried. Mercy. “What do you want? Why are you in my bedchamber? 
Why?”“My lord prince,” said Reek, “your sister has come to Winterfell. You 
asked to be informed at once if she arrived.”
“Past time,” Theon muttered, pushing his fingers through his hair. He had 
begun to fear that Asha meant to leave him to his fate. Mercy. He 
glanced outside the window, where the first vague light of dawn was just 
brushing the towers of Winterfell. “Where is she?”
“Lorren took her and her men to the Great Hall to break their fast. Will you 
see her now?”
“Yes.” Theon pushed off the blankets. The fire had burned down to embers. 
“Wex, hot water.” He could not let Asha see him disheveled and soaked with 
sweat. Wolves with children’s faces . . . He 
shivered. “Close the shutters.” The bedchamber felt as cold as the dream 
forest had been.
All his dreams had been cold of late, and each more hideous than the one 
before. Last night he had dreamed himself back in the mill again, on his knees 
dressing the dead. Their limbs were already stiffening, so they seemed to 
resist sullenly as he fumbled at them with half-frozen fingers, tugging up 
breeches and knotting laces, yanking fur-trimmed boots over hard unbending 
feet, buckling a studded leather belt around a waist no bigger than the span of 
his hands. “This was never what I wanted,” he told them as he worked. “They 
gave me no choice.” The corpses made no answer, but only grew colder and 
heavier.
The night before, it had been the miller’s wife. Theon had forgotten her name, 
but he remembered her body, soft pillowy

breasts and stretch marks on her belly, the way she clawed his back when he 
fucked her. Last night in his dream he had been in bed with her once again, but 
this time she had teeth above and below, and she tore out his throat 
even as she was gnawing off his manhood. It was madness. He’d seen her die too. 
Gelmarr had cut her down with one blow of his axe as she cried to Theon for 
mercy. Leave me, woman. It was him who killed you, not me. And he’s dead 
as well. At least Gelmarr did not haunt Theon’s sleep.
The dream had receded by the time Wex returned with the water. Theon washed the 
sweat and sleep from his body and took his own good time dressing. Asha had let 
him wait long enough; now it was her turn. He chose a satin tunic striped black 
and gold and a fine leather jerkin with silver studs . . . and 
only then remembered that his wretched sister put more stock in blades than 
beauty. Cursing, he tore off the clothes and dressed again, in felted black 
wool and ringmail. Around his waist he buckled sword and dagger, remembering 
the night she had humiliated him at his own father’s table. Her sweet 
suckling babe, yes. Well, I have a knife too, and know how to use 
it.
Last of all, he donned his crown, a band of cold iron slim as a finger, set 
with heavy chunks of black diamond and nuggets of gold. It was misshapen and 
ugly, but there was no help for that. Mikken lay buried in the lichyard, and 
the new smith was capable of little more than nails and horseshoes. Theon 
consoled himself with the reminder that it was only a prince’s crown. He would 
have something much finer when he was crowned king.Outside his door, Reek waited with Urzen and Kromm. Theon fell in with 
them. These days, he took guards with him everywhere he went, even to the 
privy. Winterfell wanted him dead. The very night they had returned from Acorn 
Water, Gelmarr the Grim had tumbled down some steps and broken his back. The 
next day, Aggar turned up with his throat slit ear to ear. Gynir Rednose became 
so wary that he shunned wine, took to sleeping in byrnie, coif, and helm, and 
adopted the noisiest dog in the kennels to give him warning should anyone try 
to steal up on his sleeping place. All the same, one morning the castle woke to 
the sound of the little dog barking wildly. They found the pup racing around 
the well, and Rednose floating in it, drowned.
He could not let the killings go unpunished. Farlen was as likely a suspect as 
any, so Theon sat in judgment, called him guilty, and condemned him to death. 
Even that went sour. As he knelt to the block, the kennelmaster said, “M’lord 
Eddard always did his own killings.” Theon had to take the axe himself or look 
a weakling. His hands were sweating, so the shaft twisted in his grip as he 
swung and the first blow landed between Farlen’s shoulders. It took three more 
cuts to hack through all that bone and muscle and sever the head from the body, 
and afterward he was sick, remembering all the times they’d sat over a cup of 
mead talking of hounds and hunting. I had no choice, he wanted to 
scream at the corpse. The ironborn can’t keep secrets, they had to die, 
and someone had to take the blame for it. He only wished he had killed him 
cleaner. Ned Stark had never needed more than a

single blow to take a man’s head.
The killings stopped after Farlen’s death, but even so his men continued sullen 
and anxious. “They fear no foe in open battle,” Black Lorren told him, “but 
it is another thing to dwell among enemies, never knowing if the washerwoman 
means to kiss you or kill you, or whether the serving boy is filling your cup 
with ale or bale. We would do well to leave this place.”
“I am the Prince of Winterfell!” Theon had shouted. “This is my seat, no man 
will drive me from it. No, nor woman either!”
Asha. It was her doing. My own sweet sister, may the Others bugger her 
with a sword. She wanted him dead, so she could steal his place as their 
father’s heir. That was why she had let him languish here, ignoring the urgent 
commands he had sent her.
He found her in the high seat of the Starks, ripping a capon apart with her 
fingers. The hall rang with the voices of her men, sharing stories with Theon’s 
own as they drank together. They were so loud that his entrance went all but 
unnoticed. “Where are the rest?” he demanded of Reek. There were no more than 
fifty men at the trestle tables, most of them his. Winterfell’s Great Hall 
could have seated ten times the number.
“This is the whole o’ the company, m’lord prince.”
“The whole—how many men did she bring?”
“Twenty, by my count.”
Theon Greyjoy strode to where his sister was sprawled. Asha was laughing at 
something one of her men had said, but broke off at his approach. “Why, ’tis 
the Prince of Winterfell.” She

tossed a bone to one of the dogs sniffing about the hall. Under that hawk’s 
beak of a nose, her wide mouth twisted in a mocking grin. “Or is it Prince of 
Fools?”
“Envy ill becomes a maid.”
Asha sucked grease from her fingers. A lock of black hair fell across her eyes. 
Her men were shouting for bread and bacon. They made a deal of noise, as few as 
they were. “Envy, Theon?”
“What else would you call it? With thirty men, I captured Winterfell in a 
night. You needed a thousand and a moon’s turn to take Deepwood 
Motte.”
“Well, I’m no great warrior like you, brother.” She quaffed half a horn of 
ale and wiped her mouth with the back of her hand. “I saw the heads above your 
gates. Tell me true, which one gave you the fiercest fight, the cripple or the 
babe?”
Theon could feel the blood rushing to his face. He took no joy from those 
heads, no more than he had in displaying the headless bodies of the children 
before the castle. Old Nan stood with her soft toothless mouth opening and 
closing soundlessly, and Farlen threw himself at Theon, snarling like one of 
his hounds. Urzen and Cadwyl had to beat him senseless with the butts of their 
spears. How did I come to this? he remembered thinking as he stood 
over the fly-speckled bodies.
Only Maester Luwin had the stomach to come near. Stone-faced, the small grey 
man had begged leave to sew the boys’ heads back onto their shoulders, so they 
might be laid in the crypts below with the other Stark dead.“No,” Theon had told him. “Not the crypts.”
“But why, my lord? Surely they cannot harm you now. It is where they belong. 
All the bones of the Starks—”
“I said no.” He needed the heads for the wall, but he had burned 
the headless bodies that very day, in all their finery. Afterward he had knelt 
amongst the bones and ashes to retrieve a slag of melted silver and cracked 
jet, all that remained of the wolf’s-head brooch that had once been Bran’s. He 
had it still.
“I treated Bran and Rickon generously,” he told his sister. “They brought 
their fate on themselves.”
“As do we all, little brother.”
His patience was at an end. “How do you expect me to hold Winterfell if you 
bring me only twenty men?”
“Ten,” Asha corrected. “The others return with me. You wouldn’t want your 
own sweet sister to brave the dangers of the wood without an escort, would you? 
There are direwolves prowling the dark.” She uncoiled from the great stone 
seat and rose to her feet. “Come, let us go somewhere we can speak more 
privily.”
She was right, he knew, though it galled him that she would make that decision. 
I should never have come to the hall, he realized belatedly. I 
should have summoned her to me.
It was too late for that now, however. Theon had no choice but to lead Asha to 
Ned Stark’s solar. There, before the ashes of a dead fire, he blurted, 
“Dagmer’s lost the fight at Torrhen’s Square—”
“The old castellan broke his shield wall, yes,” Asha said

calmly. “What did you expect? This Ser Rodrik knows the land intimately, as 
the Cleftjaw does not, and many of the northmen were mounted. The ironborn lack 
the discipline to stand a charge of armored horse. Dagmer lives, be grateful 
for that much. He’s leading the survivors back toward the Stony 
Shore.”
She knows more than I do, Theon realized. That only made him angrier. 
“The victory has given Leobald Tallhart the courage to come out from behind 
his walls and join Ser Rodrik. And I’ve had reports that Lord Manderly has sent 
a dozen barges upriver packed with knights, warhorses, and siege engines. The 
Umbers are gathering beyond the Last River as well. I’ll have an army 
at my gates before the moon turns, and you bring me only ten 
men?”
“I need not have brought you any.”
“I commanded you—”
“Father commanded me to take Deepwood Motte,” she snapped. “He 
said nothing of me having to rescue my little brother.”
“Bugger Deepwood,” he said. “It’s a wooden pisspot on a hill. Winterfell is 
the heart of the land, but how am I to hold it without a garrison?”
“You might have thought of that before you took it. Oh, it was cleverly done, 
I’ll grant you. If only you’d had the good sense to raze the castle and carry 
the two little princelings back to Pyke as hostages, you might have won the war 
in a stroke.”
“You’d like that, wouldn’t you? To see my prize reduced to ruins and 
ashes.”
“Your prize will be the doom of you. Krakens rise from the

sea, Theon, or did you forget that during your years among the 
wolves? Our strength is in our longships. My wooden pisspot sits close enough 
to the sea for supplies and fresh men to reach me whenever they are needful. 
But Winterfell is hundreds of leagues inland, ringed by woods, hills, and 
hostile holdfasts and castles. And every man in a thousand leagues is your 
enemy now, make no mistake. You made certain of that when you mounted those 
heads on your gatehouse.” Asha shook her head. “How could you be such a 
bloody fool? Children . . .”
“They defied me!” he shouted in her face. “And it was blood for blood 
besides, two sons of Eddard Stark to pay for Rodrik and Maron.” The words 
tumbled out heedlessly, but Theon knew at once that his father would approve. 
“I’ve laid my brothers’ ghosts to rest.”
“Our brothers,” Asha reminded him, with a half smile that suggested 
she took his talk of vengeance well salted. “Did you bring their ghosts from 
Pyke, brother? And here I thought they haunted only Father.”
“When has a maid ever understood a man’s need for revenge?” Even if his father 
did not appreciate the gift of Winterfell, he must approve of Theon 
avenging his brothers!
Asha snorted back a laugh. “This Ser Rodrik may well feel the same manly need, 
did you think of that? You are blood of my blood, Theon, whatever else you may 
be. For the sake of the mother who bore us both, return to Deepwood Motte with 
me. Put Winterfell to the torch and fall back while you still can.”“No.” Theon adjusted his crown. “I took this castle and I mean to hold 
it.”
His sister looked at him a long time. “Then hold it you shall,” she said, 
“for the rest of your life.” She sighed. “I say it tastes like folly, but 
what would a shy maid know of such things?” At the door she gave him one last 
mocking smile. “You ought to know, that’s the ugliest crown I’ve ever laid 
eyes on. Did you make it yourself?”
She left him fuming, and lingered no longer than was needful to feed and water 
her horses. Half the men she’d brought returned with her as threatened, riding 
out the same Hunter’s Gate that Bran and Rickon had used for their 
escape.
Theon watched them go from atop the wall. As his sister vanished into the mists 
of the wolfswood he found himself wondering why he had not listened and gone 
with her.
“Gone, has she?” Reek was at his elbow.
Theon had not heard him approach, nor smelled him either. He could not think of 
anyone he wanted to see less. It made him uneasy to see the man walking around 
breathing, with what he knew. I should have had him killed after he did 
the others, he reflected, but the notion made him nervous. Unlikely as it 
seemed, Reek could read and write, and he was possessed of enough base cunning 
to have hidden an account of what they’d done.
“M’lord prince, if you’ll pardon me saying, it’s not right for her to abandon 
you. And ten men, that won’t be near enough.”
“I am well aware of that,” Theon said. So was Asha.“Well, might be I could help you,” said Reek. “Give me a horse and bag 
o’ coin, and I could find you some good fellows.”
Theon narrowed his eyes. “How many?”
“A hundred, might be. Two hundred. Maybe more.” He smiled, his pale eyes 
glinting. “I was born up north here. I know many a man, and many a man knows 
Reek.”
Two hundred men were not an army, but you didn’t need thousands to hold a 
castle as strong as Winterfell. So long as they could learn which end of a 
spear did the killing, they might make all the difference. “Do as you say and 
you’ll not find me ungrateful. You can name your own reward.”
“Well, m’lord, I haven’t had no woman since I was with Lord Ramsay,” Reek 
said. “I’ve had my eye on that Palla, and I hear she’s already been had, 
so . . .”
He had gone too far with Reek to turn back now. “Two hundred men and she’s 
yours. But a man less and you can go back to fucking pigs.”
Reek was gone before the sun went down, carrying a bag of Stark silver and the 
last of Theon’s hopes. Like as not, I’ll never see the wretch again, 
he thought bitterly, but even so the chance had to be taken.
That night he dreamed of the feast Ned Stark had thrown when King Robert came 
to Winterfell. The hall rang with music and laughter, though the cold winds 
were rising outside. At first it was all wine and roast meat, and Theon was 
making japes and eyeing the serving girls and having himself a fine 
time . . . until he

noticed that the room was growing darker. The music did not seem so jolly then; 
he heard discords and strange silences, and notes that hung in the air 
bleeding. Suddenly the wine turned bitter in his mouth, and when he looked up 
from his cup he saw that he was dining with the dead.
King Robert sat with his guts spilling out on the table from the great gash in 
his belly, and Lord Eddard was headless beside him. Corpses lined the benches 
below, grey-brown flesh sloughing off their bones as they raised their cups to 
toast, worms crawling in and out of the holes that were their eyes. He knew 
them, every one; Jory Cassel and Fat Tom, Porther and Cayn and Hullen the 
master of horse, and all the others who had ridden south to King’s Landing 
never to return. Mikken and Chayle sat together, one dripping blood and the 
other water. Benfred Tallhart and his Wild Hares filled most of a table. The 
miller’s wife was there as well, and Farlen, even the wildling Theon had killed 
in the wolfswood the day he had saved Bran’s life.
But there were others with faces he had never known in life, faces he had seen 
only in stone. The slim, sad girl who wore a crown of pale blue roses and a 
white gown spattered with gore could only be Lyanna. Her brother Brandon stood 
beside her, and their father Lord Rickard just behind. Along the walls figures 
half-seen moved through the shadows, pale shades with long grim faces. The 
sight of them sent fear shivering through Theon sharp as a knife. And then the 
tall doors opened with a crash, and a freezing gale blew down the hall, and 
Robb came walking out of the

night. Grey Wind stalked beside, eyes burning, and man and wolf alike bled from 
half a hundred savage wounds.
Theon woke with a scream, startling Wex so badly that the boy ran naked from 
the room. When his guards burst in with drawn swords, he ordered them to bring 
him the maester. By the time Luwin arrived rumpled and sleepy, a cup of wine 
had steadied Theon’s hands, and he was feeling ashamed of his panic. “A 
dream,” he muttered, “that was all it was. It meant nothing.”
“Nothing,” Luwin agreed solemnly. He left a sleeping draught, but Theon 
poured it down the privy shaft the moment he was gone. Luwin was a man as well 
as a maester, and the man had no love for him. He wants me to sleep, 
yes . . . to sleep and never wake. He’d like that as much as 
Asha would.
He sent for Kyra, kicked shut the door, climbed on top of her, and fucked the 
wench with a fury he’d never known was in him. By the time he finished, she was 
sobbing, her neck and breasts covered with bruises and bite marks. Theon shoved 
her from the bed and threw her a blanket. “Get out.”
Yet even then, he could not sleep.
Come dawn, he dressed and went outside, to walk along the outer walls. A brisk 
autumn wind was swirling through the battlements. It reddened his cheeks and 
stung his eyes. He watched the forest go from grey to green below him as light 
filtered through the silent trees. On his left he could see tower tops
above the inner wall, their roofs gilded by the rising sun. The red leaves of 
the weirwood were a blaze of flame among

the green. Ned Stark’s tree, he thought, and Stark’s wood, 
Stark’s castle, Stark’s sword, Stark’s gods. This is their place, not mine. I 
am a Greyjoy of Pyke, born to paint a kraken on my shield and sail the great 
salt sea. I should have gone with Asha.
On their iron spikes atop the gatehouse, the heads waited.
Theon gazed at them silently while the wind tugged on his cloak with small 
ghostly hands. The miller’s boys had been of an age with Bran and Rickon, alike 
in size and coloring, and once Reek had flayed the skin from their faces and 
dipped their heads in tar, it was easy to see familiar features in those 
misshapen lumps of rotting flesh. People were such fools. If we’d said 
they were rams’ heads, they would have seen horns.

Maester Luwin came to him when the first scouts were seen outside the 
walls. “My lord prince,” he said, “you must yield.”
Theon stared at the platter of oatcakes, honey, and blood sausage they’d 
brought him to break his fast. Another sleepless night had left his nerves raw, 
and the very sight of food sickened him. “There has been no reply from my 
uncle?”
“None,” the maester said. “Nor from your father on Pyke.”
“Send more birds.”“It will not serve. By the time the birds 
reach—”
“Send them!” Knocking the platter of food aside with a swipe of his 
arm, he pushed off the blankets and rose from Ned Stark’s bed naked and angry. 
“Or do you want me dead? Is that it, Luwin? The truth now.”
The small grey man was unafraid. “My order serves.”
“Yes, but whom?”
“The realm,” Maester Luwin said, “and Winterfell. Theon, once I taught you 
sums and letters, history and warcraft. And might have taught you more, had you 
wished to learn. I will not claim to bear you any great love, no, but I cannot 
hate you either. Even if I did, so long as you hold Winterfell I am bound by 
oath to give you counsel. So now I counsel you to yield.”
Theon stooped to scoop a puddled cloak off the floor, shook

off the rushes, and draped it over his shoulders. A fire, I’ll have a 
fire, and clean garb. Where’s Wex? I’ll not go to my grave in dirty 
clothes.
“You have no hope of holding here,” the maester went on. “If your lord 
father meant to send you aid, he would have done so by now. It is the Neck that 
concerns him. The battle for the north will be fought amidst the ruins of Moat 
Cailin.”
“That may be so,” said Theon. “And so long as I hold Winterfell, Ser Rodrik 
and Stark’s lords bannermen cannot march south to take my uncle in the rear.” 
I am not so innocent of warcraft as you think, old man. “I have food 
enough to stand a year’s siege, if need be.”
“There will be no siege. Perhaps they will spend a day or two fashioning 
ladders and tying grapnels to the ends of ropes. But soon enough they will come 
over your walls in a hundred places at once. You may be able to hold the keep 
for a time, but the castle will fall within the hour. You would do better to 
open your gates and ask for—”
“—mercy? I know what kind of mercy they have for 
me.”
“There is a way.”
“I am ironborn,” Theon reminded him. “I have my own way. What choice have 
they left me? No, don’t answer, I’ve heard enough of your counsel. Go 
and send those birds as I commanded, and tell Lorren I want to see him. And Wex 
as well. I’ll have my mail scoured clean, and my garrison assembled in the 
yard.”
For a moment he thought the maester was going to defy him.

But finally Luwin bowed stiffly. “As you command.”
They made a pitifully small assembly; the ironmen were few, the yard large. 
“The northmen will be on us before nightfall,” he told them. “Ser Rodrik 
Cassel and all the lords who have come to his call. I will not run from them. I 
took this castle and I mean to hold it, to live or die as Prince of Winterfell. 
But I will not command any man to die with me. If you leave now, before Ser 
Rodrik’s main force is upon us, there’s still a chance you may win free.” He 
unsheathed his longsword and drew a line in the dirt. “Those who would stay 
and fight, step forward.”
No one spoke. The men stood in their mail and fur and boiled leather, as still 
as if they were made of stone. A few exchanged looks. Urzen shuffled his feet. 
Dykk Harlaw hawked and spat. A finger of wind ruffled Endehar’s long fair 
hair.
Theon felt as though he were drowning. Why am I surprised? he thought 
bleakly. His father had forsaken him, his uncles, his sister, even that 
wretched creature Reek. Why should his men prove any more loyal? There was 
nothing to say, nothing to do. He could only stand there beneath the great grey 
walls and the hard white sky, sword in hand, waiting, 
waiting . . .
Wex was the first to cross the line. Three quick steps and he stood at Theon’s 
side, slouching. Shamed by the boy, Black Lorren followed, all scowls. “Who 
else?” he demanded. Red Rolfe came forward. Kromm. Werlag. Tymor and his 
brothers. Ulf the Ill. Harrag Sheepstealer. Four Harlaws and two Botleys. 
Kenned the Whale was the last. Seventeen in all.Urzen was among those who did not move, and Stygg, and every man of the 
ten that Asha had brought from Deepwood Motte. “Go, then,” Theon told them. 
“Run to my sister. She’ll give you all a warm welcome, I have no 
doubt.”
Stygg had the grace at least to look ashamed. The rest moved off without a 
word. Theon turned to the seventeen who remained. “Back to the walls. If the 
gods should spare us, I shall remember every man of you.”
Black Lorren stayed when the others had gone. “The castle folk will turn on us 
soon as the fight begins.”
“I know that. What would you have me do?”
“Put them out,” said Lorren. “Every one.”
Theon shook his head. “Is the noose ready?”
“It is. You mean to use it?”
“Do you know a better way?”
“Aye. I’ll take my axe and stand on that drawbridge, and let them come try me. 
One at a time, two, three, it makes no matter. None will pass the moat while I 
still draw breath.”
He means to die, thought Theon. It’s not victory he wants, it’s 
an end worthy of a song. “We’ll use the noose.”
“As you say,” Lorren replied, contempt in his eyes.
Wex helped garb him for battle. Beneath his black surcoat and golden mantle was 
a shirt of well-oiled ringmail, and under that a layer of stiff boiled leather. 
Once armed and armored, Theon climbed the watchtower at the angle where the 
eastern and southern walls came together to have a look at his doom. The

northmen were spreading out to encircle the castle. It was hard to judge their 
numbers. A thousand at least; perhaps twice that many. Against 
seventeen. They’d brought catapults and scorpions. He saw no siege towers 
rumbling up the kingsroad, but there was timber enough in the wolfswood to 
build as many as were required.
Theon studied their banners through Maester Luwin’s Myrish lens tube. The 
Cerwyn battle-axe flapped bravely wherever he looked, and there were Tallhart 
trees as well, and mermen from White Harbor. Less common were the sigils of 
Flint and Karstark. Here and there he even saw the bull moose of the Hornwoods. 
But no Glovers, Asha saw to them, no Boltons from the Dreadfort, no Umbers 
come down from the shadow of the Wall. Not that they were needed. Soon 
enough the boy Cley Cerwyn appeared before the gates carrying a peace banner on 
a tall staff, to announce that Ser Rodrik Cassel wished to parley with Theon 
Turncloak.
Turncloak. The name was bitter as bile. He had gone to Pyke to lead 
his father’s longships against Lannisport, he remembered. “I shall be out 
shortly,” he shouted down. “Alone.”
Black Lorren disapproved. “Only blood can wash out blood,” he declared. 
“Knights may keep their truces with other knights, but they are not so careful 
of their honor when dealing with those they deem outlaw.”
Theon bristled. “I am the Prince of Winterfell and heir to the Iron Islands. 
Now go find the girl and do as I told you.”
Black Lorren gave him a murderous look. “Aye, Prince.”
He’s turned against me too, Theon realized. Of late it

seemed to him as if the very stones of Winterfell had turned against him. 
If I die, I die friendless and abandoned. What choice did that leave 
him, but to live?
He rode to the gatehouse with his crown on his head. A woman was drawing water 
from the well, and Gage the cook stood in the door of the kitchens. They hid 
their hatred behind sullen looks and faces blank as slate, yet he could feel it 
all the same.
When the drawbridge was lowered, a chill wind sighed across the moat. The touch 
of it made him shiver. It is the cold, nothing more, Theon told 
himself, a shiver, not a tremble. Even brave men shiver. Into the 
teeth of that wind he rode, under the portcullis, over the drawbridge. The 
outer gates swung open to let him pass. As he emerged beneath the walls, he 
could sense the boys watching from the empty sockets where their eyes had 
been.
Ser Rodrik waited in the market astride his dappled gelding. Beside him, the 
direwolf of Stark flapped from a staff borne by young Cley Cerwyn. They were 
alone in the square, though Theon could see archers on the roofs of surrounding 
houses, spearmen to his right, and to his left a line of mounted knights 
beneath the merman-and-trident of House Manderly. Every one of them wants 
me dead. Some were boys he’d drunk with, diced with, even wenched with, 
but that would not save him if he fell into their hands.
“Ser Rodrik.” Theon reined to a halt. “It grieves me that we must meet as 
foes.”
“My own grief is that I must wait a while to hang you.” The old knight spat 
onto the muddy ground. “Theon Turncloak.”“I am a Greyjoy of Pyke,” Theon reminded him. “The cloak my father 
swaddled me in bore a kraken, not a direwolf.”
“For ten years you have been a ward of Stark.”
“Hostage and prisoner, I call it.”
“Then perhaps Lord Eddard should have kept you chained to a dungeon wall. 
Instead he raised you among his own sons, the sweet boys you have butchered, 
and to my undying shame I trained you in the arts of war. Would that I had 
thrust a sword through your belly instead of placing one in your 
hand.”
“I came out to parley, not to suffer your insults. Say what you have to say, 
old man. What would you have of me?”
“Two things,” the old man said. “Winterfell, and your life. Command your men 
to open the gates and lay down their arms. Those who murdered no children shall 
be free to walk away, but you shall be held for King Robb’s justice. May the 
gods take pity on you when he returns.”
“Robb will never look on Winterfell again,” Theon promised. “He will break 
himself on Moat Cailin, as every southron army has done for ten thousand years. 
We hold the north now, ser.”
“You hold three castles,” replied Ser Rodrik, “and this one I mean to take 
back, Turncloak.”
Theon ignored that. “Here are my terms. You have until evenfall to 
disperse. Those who swear fealty to Balon Greyjoy as their king and to myself 
as Prince of Winterfell will be confirmed in their rights and properties and 
suffer no harm. Those who defy us will be destroyed.”Young Cerwyn was incredulous. “Are you mad, Greyjoy?”
Ser Rodrik shook his head. “Only vain, lad. Theon has always had too lofty an 
opinion of himself, I fear.” The old man jabbed a finger at him. “Do not 
imagine that I need wait for Robb to fight his way up the Neck to deal with the 
likes of you. I have near two thousand men with me . . . and if 
the tales be true, you have no more than fifty.”
Seventeen, in truth. Theon made himself smile. “I have something 
better than men.” And he raised a fist over his head, the signal Black Lorren 
had been told to watch for.
The walls of Winterfell were behind him, but Ser Rodrik faced them squarely and 
could not fail to see. Theon watched his face. When his chin quivered under 
those stiff white whiskers, he knew just what the old man was seeing. He 
is not surprised, he thought with sadness, but the fear is 
there.
“This is craven,” Ser Rodrik said. “To use a child 
so . . . this is despicable.”
“Oh, I know,” said Theon. “It’s a dish I tasted myself, or have you 
forgotten? I was ten when I was taken from my father’s house, to make certain 
he would raise no more rebellions.”
“It is not the same!”
Theon’s face was impassive. “The noose I wore was not made of hempen rope, 
that’s true enough, but I felt it all the same. And it chafed, Ser Rodrik. It 
chafed me raw.” He had never quite realized that until now, but as the words 
came spilling out he saw the truth of them.“No harm was ever done you.”
“And no harm will be done your Beth, so long as you—”
Ser Rodrik never gave him the chance to finish. “Viper,” the knight 
declared, his face red with rage beneath those white whiskers. “I gave you the 
chance to save your men and die with some small shred of honor, Turncloak. I 
should have known that was too much to ask of a childkiller.” His hand went to 
the hilt of his sword. “I ought cut you down here and now and put an end to 
your lies and deceits. By the gods, I should.”
Theon did not fear a doddering old man, but those watching archers and that 
line of knights were a different matter. If the swords came out his chances of 
getting back to the castle alive were small to none. “Forswear your oath and 
murder me, and you will watch your little Beth strangle at the end of a 
rope.”
Ser Rodrik’s knuckles had gone white, but after a moment he took his hand off 
the swordhilt. “Truly, I have lived too long.”
“I will not disagree, ser. Will you accept my terms?”
“I have a duty to Lady Catelyn and House Stark.”
“And your own House? Beth is the last of your blood.”
The old knight drew himself up straight. “I offer myself in my daughter’s 
place. Release her, and take me as your hostage. Surely the castellan of 
Winterfell is worth more than a child.”
“Not to me.” A valiant gesture, old man, but I am not that great a 
fool. “Not to Lord Manderly or Leobald Tallhart either, I’d wager.” 
Your sorry old skin is worth no more to them than any other man’s. 
“No, I’ll keep the girl . . . and keep her safe, so

long as you do as I’ve commanded you. Her life is in your hands.”
“Gods be good, Theon, how can you do this? You know I must attack, have 
sworn . . .”
“If this host is still in arms before my gate when the sun sets, Beth will 
hang,” said Theon. “Another hostage will follow her to the grave at first 
light, and another at sunset. Every dawn and every dusk will mean a death, 
until you are gone. I have no lack of hostages.” He did not wait for a reply, 
but wheeled Smiler around and rode back toward the castle. He went slowly at 
first, but the thought of those archers at his back soon drove him to a canter. 
The small heads watched him come from their spikes, their tarred and flayed 
faces looming larger with every yard; between them stood little Beth Cassel, 
noosed and crying. Theon put his heel into Smiler and broke into a hard gallop. 
Smiler’s hooves clattered on the drawbridge, like drumbeats.
In the yard he dismounted and handed his reins to Wex. “It may stay them,” he 
told Black Lorren. “We’ll know by sunset. Take the girl in till then, and keep 
her somewhere safe.” Under the layers of leather, steel, and wool, he was 
slick with sweat. “I need a cup of wine. A vat of wine would do even 
better.”
A fire had been laid in Ned Stark’s bedchamber. Theon sat beside it and filled 
a cup with a heavy-bodied red from the castle vaults, a wine as sour as his 
mood. They will attack, he thought gloomily, staring at the flames. 
Ser Rodrik loves his daughter, but he is still castellan, and most of all 
a knight. Had it been Theon with a noose around his neck and Lord Balon 
commanding the

army without, the warhorns would already have sounded the attack, he had no 
doubt. He should thank the gods that Ser Rodrik was not ironborn. The men of 
the green lands were made of softer stuff, though he was not certain they would 
prove soft enough.
If not, if the old man gave the command to storm the castle regardless, 
Winterfell would fall; Theon entertained no delusions on that count. His 
seventeen might kill three, four, five times their own number, but in the end 
they would be overwhelmed.
Theon stared at the flames over the rim of his wine goblet, brooding on the 
injustice of it all. “I rode beside Robb Stark in the Whispering Wood,” he 
muttered. He had been frightened that night, but not like this. It was one 
thing to go into battle surrounded by friends, and another to perish alone and 
despised. Mercy, he thought miserably.
When the wine brought no solace, Theon sent Wex to fetch his bow and took 
himself to the old inner ward. There he stood, loosing shaft after shaft at the 
archery butts until his shoulders ached and his fingers were bloody, pausing 
only long enough to pull the arrows from the targets for another round. I 
saved Bran’s life with this bow, he reminded himself. Would that I 
could save my own. Women came to the well, but did not linger; whatever 
they saw on Theon’s face sent them away quickly.
Behind him the broken tower stood, its summit as jagged as a crown where fire 
had collapsed the upper stories long ago. As the sun moved, the shadow of the 
tower moved as well, gradually lengthening, a black arm reaching out for Theon 
Greyjoy. By the

time the sun touched the wall, he was in its grasp. If I hang the girl, 
the northmen will attack at once, he thought as he loosed a shaft. If 
I do not hang her, they will know my threats are empty. He knocked another 
arrow to his bow. There is no way out, none.
“If you had a hundred archers as good as yourself, you might have a chance to 
hold the castle,” a voice said softly.
When he turned, Maester Luwin was behind him. “Go away,” Theon told him. “I 
have had enough of your counsel.”
“And life? Have you had enough of that, my lord prince?”
He raised the bow. “One more word and I’ll put this shaft through your 
heart.”
“You won’t.”
Theon bent the bow, drawing the grey goose feathers back to his cheek. “Care 
to make a wager?”
“I am your last hope, Theon.”
I have no hope, he thought. Yet he lowered the bow half an inch and 
said, “I will not run.”
“I do not speak of running. Take the black.”
“The Night’s Watch?” Theon let the bow unbend slowly and pointed the arrow at 
the ground.
“Ser Rodrik has served House Stark all his life, and House Stark has always 
been a friend to the Watch. He will not deny you. Open your gates, lay down 
your arms, accept his terms, and he must let you take the 
black.”
A brother of the Night’s Watch. It meant no crown, no sons, no 
wife . . . but it meant life, and life with honor. Ned Stark’s

own brother had chosen the Watch, and Jon Snow as well.
I have black garb aplenty, once I tear the krakens off. Even my horse is 
black. I could rise high in the Watch—chief of rangers, likely even Lord 
Commander. Let Asha keep the bloody islands, they’re as dreary as she is. If I 
served at Eastwatch, I could command my own ship, and there’s fine hunting 
beyond the Wall. As for women, what wildling woman wouldn’t want a prince in 
her bed? A slow smile crept across his face. A black cloak can’t be 
turned. I’d be as good as any man . . .
“PRINCE THEON!” The sudden shout shattered his daydream. Kromm was 
loping across the ward. “The northmen—”
He felt a sudden sick sense of dread. “Is it the attack?”
Maester Luwin clutched his arm. “There’s still time. Raise a peace 
banner—”
“They’re fighting,” Kromm said urgently. “More men came up, hundreds of 
them, and at first they made to join the others. But now they’ve fallen on 
them!”
“Is it Asha?” Had she come to save him after all?
But Kromm gave a shake of his head. “No. These are northmen, I tell 
you. With a bloody man on their banner.”
The flayed man of the Dreadfort. Reek had belonged to the Bastard of 
Bolton before his capture, Theon recalled. It was hard to believe that a vile 
creature like him could sway the Boltons to change their allegiance, but 
nothing else made sense. “I’ll see this for myself,” Theon said.
Maester Luwin trailed after him. By the time they reached

the battlements, dead men and dying horses were strewn about the market square 
outside the gates. He saw no battle lines, only a swirling chaos of banners and 
blades. Shouts and screams rang through the cold autumn air. Ser Rodrik seemed 
to have the numbers, but the Dreadfort men were better led, and had taken the 
others unawares. Theon watched them charge and wheel and charge again, chopping 
the larger force to bloody pieces every time they tried to form up between the 
houses. He could hear the crash of iron axeheads on oaken shields over the 
terrified trumpeting of a maimed horse. The inn was burning, he saw.
Black Lorren appeared beside him and stood silently for a time. The sun was low 
in the west, painting the fields and houses all a glowing red. A thin wavering 
cry of pain drifted over the walls, and a warhorn sounded off beyond the 
burning houses. Theon watched a wounded man drag himself painfully across the 
ground, smearing his life’s blood in the dirt as he struggled to reach the well 
that stood at the center of the market square. He died before he got there. He 
wore a leather jerkin and conical halfhelm, but no badge to tell which side 
he’d fought on.
The crows came in the blue dusk, with the evening stars. “The Dothraki believe 
the stars are spirits of the valiant dead,” Theon said. Maester Luwin had told 
him that, a long time ago.
“Dothraki?”
“The horselords across the narrow sea.”
“Oh. Them.” Black Lorren frowned through his beard. “Savages believe all 
manner of foolish things.”As the night grew darker and the smoke spread it was harder to make out 
what was happening below, but the din of steel gradually diminished to nothing, 
and the shouts and warhorns gave way to moans and piteous wailing. Finally a 
column of mounted men rode out of the drifting smoke. At their head was a 
knight in dark armor. His rounded helm gleamed a sullen red, and a pale pink 
cloak streamed from his shoulders. Outside the main gate he reined up, and one 
of his men shouted for the castle to open.
“Are you friend or foe?” Black Lorren bellowed down.
“Would a foe bring such fine gifts?” Red Helm waved a hand, and three corpses 
were dumped in front of the gates. A torch was waved above the bodies, so the 
defenders upon the walls might see the faces of the dead.
“The old castellan,” said Black Lorren.
“With Leobald Tallhart and Cley Cerwyn.” The boy lord had taken an arrow in 
the eye, and Ser Rodrik had lost his left arm at the elbow. Maester Luwin gave 
a wordless cry of dismay, turned away from the battlements, and fell to his 
knees sick.
“The great pig Manderly was too craven to leave White Harbor, or we would have 
brought him as well,” shouted Red Helm.
I am saved, Theon thought. So why did he feel so empty? This was 
victory, sweet victory, the deliverance he had prayed for. He glanced at 
Maester Luwin. To think how close I came to yielding, and taking the 
black . . .
“Open the gates for our friends.” Perhaps tonight Theon would sleep without 
fear of what his dreams might bring.The Dreadfort men made their way across the moat and through the inner 
gates. Theon descended with Black Lorren and Maester Luwin to meet them in the 
yard. Pale red pennons trailed from the ends of a few lances, but many more 
carried battle-axes and greatswords and shields hacked half to splinters. “How 
many men did you lose?” Theon asked Red Helm as he dismounted.
“Twenty or thirty.” The torchlight glittered off the chipped enamel of his 
visor. His helm and gorget were wrought in the shape of a man’s face and 
shoulders, skinless and bloody, mouth open in a silent howl of 
anguish.
“Ser Rodrik had you five-to-one.”
“Aye, but he thought us friends. A common mistake. When the old fool gave me 
his hand, I took half his arm instead. Then I let him see my face.” The man 
put both hands to his helm and lifted it off his head, holding it in the crook 
of his arm.
“Reek,” Theon said, disquieted. How did a serving man get such fine 
armor?
The man laughed. “The wretch is dead.” He stepped closer. “The girl’s fault. 
If she had not run so far, his horse would not have lamed, and we might have 
been able to flee. I gave him mine when I saw the riders from the ridge. I was 
done with her by then, and he liked to take his turn while they were still 
warm. I had to pull him off her and shove my clothes into his 
hands—calfskin boots and velvet doublet, silver-chased swordbelt, even 
my sable cloak. Ride for the Dreadfort, I told him, bring all the help you can. 
Take my horse, he’s swifter, and here, wear the

ring my father gave me, so they’ll know you came from me. He’d learned better 
than to question me. By the time they put that arrow through his back, I’d 
smeared myself with the girl’s filth and dressed in his rags. They might have 
hanged me anyway, but it was the only chance I saw.” He rubbed the back of his 
hand across his mouth. “And now, my sweet prince, there was a woman promised 
me, if I brought two hundred men. Well, I brought three times as many, and no 
green boys nor fieldhands neither, but my father’s own garrison.”
Theon had given his word. This was not the time to flinch. Pay him his 
pound of flesh and deal with him later. “Harrag,” he said, “go to the 
kennels and bring Palla out for . . . ?”
“Ramsay.” There was a smile on his plump lips, but none in those pale pale 
eyes. “Snow, my wife called me before she ate her fingers, but I say Bolton.” 
His smile curdled. “So you’d offer me a kennel girl for my good service, is 
that the way of it?”
There was a tone in his voice Theon did not like, no more than he liked the 
insolent way the Dreadfort men were looking at him. “She was what was 
promised.”
“She smells of dogshit. I’ve had enough of bad smells, as it happens. I think 
I’ll have your bedwarmer instead. What do you call her? Kyra?”
“Are you mad?” Theon said angrily. “I’ll have 
you—”
The Bastard’s backhand caught him square, and his cheekbone shattered with a 
sickening crunch beneath the lobstered steel. The world vanished in a red roar 
of pain.Sometime later, Theon found himself on the ground. He rolled onto his 
stomach and swallowed a mouthful of blood. Close the gates! he tried 
to shout, but it was too late. The Dreadfort men had cut down Red Rolfe and 
Kenned, and more were pouring through, a river of mail and sharp swords. There 
was a ringing in his ears, and horror all around him. Black Lorren had his 
sword out, but there were already four of them pressing in on him. He saw Ulf 
go down with a crossbow bolt through the belly as he ran for the Great Hall. 
Maester Luwin was trying to reach him when a knight on a warhorse planted a 
spear between his shoulders, then swung back to ride over him. Another man whipped a 
torch round and round his head and then lofted it toward the thatched roof of 
the stables. “Save me the Freys,” the Bastard was shouting as the 
flames roared upward, “and burn the rest. Burn it, burn it 
all.”
The last thing Theon Greyjoy saw was Smiler, kicking free of the burning 
stables with his mane ablaze, screaming, rearing . . .

Day stole upon them just as Stannis had: unseen.
Winterfell had been awake for hours, its battlements and towers crammed with men in wool and mail and leather awaiting an attack that never came. By the time the sky began to lighten the sound of drums had faded away, though warhorns were heard thrice more, each time a little closer. And still the snow fell.
“The storm will end today,” one of the surviving stableboys was insisting loudly. “Why, it isn’t even winter.” Theon would have laughed if he had dared. He remembered tales Old Nan had told them of storms that raged for forty days and forty nights, for a year, for ten years … storms that buried castles and cities and whole kingdoms under a hundred feet of snow.
He sat in the back of the Great Hall, not far from the horses, watching Abel, Rowan, and a mousy brown-haired washerwoman called Squirrel attack slabs of stale brown bread fried in bacon grease. Theon broke his own fast with a tankard of dark ale, cloudy with yeast and thick enough to chew on. A few more tankards, and perhaps Abel’s plan might not seem quite so mad.
Roose Bolton entered, pale-eyed and yawning, accompanied by his plump and pregnant wife, Fat Walda. Several lords and captains had preceded him, amongst them Whoresbane Umber, Aenys Frey, and Roger Ryswell. Farther down the table Wyman Manderly sat wolfing down sausages and boiled eggs, whilst old Lord Locke beside him spooned gruel into his toothless mouth.
Lord Ramsay soon appeared as well, buckling on his sword belt as he made his way to the front of the hall. His mood is foul this morning. Theon could tell. The drums kept him awake all night, he guessed, or someone has displeased him. One wrong word, an ill-considered look, an ill-timed laugh, any of them could provoke his lordship’s wroth and cost a man a strip of skin. Please, m’lord, don’t look this way. One glance would be all it would take for Ramsay to know everything. He’ll see it written on my face. He’ll know. He always knows.
Theon turned to Abel. “This will not work.” His voice was pitched so low that even the horses could not have overheard. “We will be caught before we leave the castle. Even if we do escape, Lord Ramsay will hunt us down, him and Ben Bones and the girls.”
“Lord Stannis is outside the walls, and not far by the sound of it. All we need do is reach him.” Abel’s fingers danced across the strings of his lute. The singer’s beard was brown, though his long hair had largely gone to grey. “If the Bastard does come after us, he might live long enough to rue it.”
Think that, Theon thought. Believe that. Tell yourself it’s true. “Ramsay will use your women as his prey,” he told the singer. “He’ll hunt them down, rape them, and feed their corpses to his dogs. If they lead him a good chase, he may name his next litter of bitches after them. You he’ll flay. Him and Skinner and Damon Dance-for-Me, they will make a game of it. You’ll be begging them to kill you.” He clutched the singer’s arm with a maimed hand. “You swore you would not let me fall into his hands again. I have your word on that.” He needed to hear it again.
“Abel’s word,” said Squirrel. “Strong as oak.” Abel himself only shrugged. “No matter what, my prince.”
Up on the dais, Ramsay was arguing with his father. They were too far away for Theon to make out any of the words, but the fear on Fat Walda’s round pink face spoke volumes. He did hear Wyman Manderly calling for more sausages and Roger Ryswell’s laughter at some jape from one-armed Harwood Stout.
Theon wondered if he would ever see the Drowned God’s watery halls, or if his ghost would linger here at Winterfell. Dead is dead. Better dead than Reek. If Abel’s scheme went awry, Ramsay would make their dying long and hard. He will flay me from head to heel this time, and no amount of begging will end the anguish. No pain Theon had ever known came close to the agony that Skinner could evoke with a little flensing blade. Abel would learn that lesson soon enough. And for what? Jeyne, her name is Jeyne, and her eyes are the wrong color. A mummer playing a part. Lord Bolton knows, and Ramsay, but the rest are blind, even this bloody bard with his sly smiles. The jape is on you, Abel, you and your murdering whores. You’ll die for the wrong girl.
He had come this close to telling them the truth when Rowan had delivered him to Abel in the ruins of the Burned Tower, but at the last instant he had held his tongue. The singer seemed intent on making off with the daughter of Eddard Stark. If he knew that Lord Ramsay’s bride was but a steward’s whelp, well …
The doors of the Great Hall opened with a crash.
A cold wind came swirling through, and a cloud of ice crystals sparkled blue-white in the air. Through it strode Ser Hosteen Frey, caked with snow to the waist, a body in his arms. All along the benches men put down their cups and spoons to turn and gape at the grisly spectacle. The hall grew quiet.
Another murder.
Snow slid from Ser Hosteen’s cloaks as he stalked toward the high table, his steps ringing against the floor. A dozen Frey knights and men-at-arms entered behind him. One was a boy Theon knew—Big Walder, the little one, fox-faced and skinny as a stick. His chest and arms and cloak were spattered with blood.
The scent of it set the horses to screaming. Dogs slid out from under the tables, sniffing. Men rose from the benches. The body in Ser Hosteen’s arms sparkled in the torchlight, armored in pink frost. The cold outside had frozen his blood.
“My brother Merrett’s son.” Hosteen Frey lowered the body to the floor before the dais. “Butchered like a hog and shoved beneath a snowbank. A boy.”
Little Walder, thought Theon. The big one. He glanced at Rowan. There are six of them, he remembered. Any of them could have done this. But the washerwoman felt his eyes. “This was no work of ours,” she said.
“Be quiet,” Abel warned her.
Lord Ramsay descended from the dais to the dead boy. His father rose more slowly, pale-eyed, still-faced, solemn. “This was foul work.” For once Roose Bolton’s voice was loud enough to carry. “Where was the body found?”
“Under that ruined keep, my lord,” replied Big Walder. “The one with the old gargoyles.” The boy’s gloves were caked with his cousin’s blood. “I told him not to go out alone, but he said he had to find a man who owed him silver.”
“What man?” Ramsay demanded. “Give me his name. Point him out to me, boy, and I will make you a cloak of his skin.”
“He never said, my lord. Only that he won the coin at dice.” The Frey boy hesitated. “It was some White Harbor men who taught dice. I couldn’t say which ones, but it was them.”
“My lord,” boomed Hosteen Frey. “We know the man who did this. Killed this boy and all the rest. Not by his own hand, no. He is too fat and craven to do his own killing. But by his word.” He turned to Wyman Manderly. “Do you deny it?”
The Lord of White Harbor bit a sausage in half. “I confess …” He wiped the grease from his lips with his sleeve. “… I confess that I know little of this poor boy. Lord Ramsay’s squire, was he not? How old was the lad?”
“Nine, on his last nameday.”
“So young,” said Wyman Manderly. “Though mayhaps this was a blessing. Had he lived, he would have grown up to be a Frey.”
Ser Hosteen slammed his foot into the tabletop, knocking it off its trestles, back into Lord Wyman’s swollen belly. Cups and platters flew, sausages scattered everywhere, and a dozen Manderly men came cursing to their feet. Some grabbed up knives, platters, flagons, anything that might serve as a weapon.
Ser Hosteen Frey ripped his longsword from its scabbard and leapt toward Wyman Manderly. The Lord of White Harbor tried to jerk away, but the tabletop pinned him to his chair. The blade slashed through three of his four chins in a spray of bright red blood. Lady Walda gave a shriek and clutched at her lord husband’s arm. “Stop,” Roose Bolton shouted. “Stop this madness.” His own men rushed forward as the Manderlys vaulted over the benches to get at the Freys. One lunged at Ser Hosteen with a dagger, but the big knight pivoted and took his arm off at the shoulder. Lord Wyman pushed to his feet, only to collapse. Old Lord Locke was shouting for a maester as Manderly flopped on the floor like a clubbed walrus in a spreading pool of blood. Around him dogs fought over sausages.
It took two score Dreadfort spearmen to part the combatants and put an end to the carnage. By that time six White Harbor men and two Freys lay dead upon the floor. A dozen more were wounded and one of the Bastard’s Boys, Luton, was dying noisily, crying for his mother as he tried to shove a fistful of slimy entrails back through a gaping belly wound. Lord Ramsay silenced him, yanking a spear from one of Steelshanks’s men and driving it down through Luton’s chest. Even then the rafters still rang with shouts and prayers and curses, the shrieks of terrified horses and the growls of Ramsay’s bitches. Steelshanks Walton had to slam the butt of his spear against the floor a dozen times before the hall quieted enough for Roose Bolton to be heard.
“I see you all want blood,” the Lord of the Dreadfort said. Maester Rhodry stood beside him, a raven on his arm. The bird’s black plumage shone like coal oil in the torchlight. Wet, Theon realized. And in his lordship’s hand, a parchment. That will be wet as well. Dark wings, dark words. “Rather than use our swords upon each other, you might try them on Lord Stannis.” Lord Bolton unrolled the parchment. “His host lies not three days’ ride from here, snowbound and starving, and I for one am tired of waiting on his pleasure. Ser Hosteen, assemble your knights and men-at-arms by the main gates. As you are so eager for battle, you shall strike our first blow. Lord Wyman, gather your White Harbor men by the east gate. They shall go forth as well.”
Hosteen Frey’s sword was red almost to the hilt. Blood spatters speckled his cheeks like freckles. He lowered his blade and said, “As my lord commands. But after I deliver you the head of Stannis Baratheon, I mean to finish hacking off Lord Lard’s.”
Four White Harbor knights had formed a ring around Lord Wyman, as Maester Medrick labored over him to staunch his bleeding. “First you must needs come through us, ser,” said the eldest of them, a hard-faced greybeard whose bloodstained surcoat showed three silvery mermaids upon a violet field.
“Gladly. One at a time or all at once, it makes no matter.”
“Enough,” roared Lord Ramsay, brandishing his bloody spear. “Another threat, and I’ll gut you all myself. My lord father has spoken! Save your wroth for the pretender Stannis.”
Roose Bolton gave an approving nod. “As he says. There will be time enough to fight each other once we are done with Stannis.” He turned his head, his pale cold eyes searching the hall until they found the bard Abel beside Theon. “Singer,” he called, “come sing us something soothing.”
Abel bowed. “If it please your lordship.” Lute in hand, he sauntered to the dais, hopping nimbly over a corpse or two, and seated himself cross-legged on the high table. As he began to play—a sad, soft song that Theon Greyjoy did not recognize—Ser Hosteen, Ser Aenys, and their fellow Freys turned away to lead their horses from the hall.
Rowan grasped Theon’s arm. “The bath. It must be now.”
He wrenched free of her touch. “By day? We will be seen.”
“The snow will hide us. Are you deaf? Bolton is sending forth his swords. We have to reach King Stannis before they do.”
“But … Abel …”
“Abel can fend for himself,” murmured Squirrel.
This is madness. Hopeless, foolish, doomed. Theon drained the last dregs of his ale and rose reluctantly to his feet. “Find your sisters. It takes a deal of water to fill my lady’s tub.”
Squirrel slipped away, soft-footed as she always was. Rowan walked Theon from the hall. Since she and her sisters had found him in the godswood, one of them had dogged his every step, never letting him out of sight. They did not trust him. Why should they? I was Reek before and might be Reek again. Reek, Reek, it rhymes with sneak.
Outside the snow still fell. The snowmen the squires had built had grown into monstrous giants, ten feet tall and hideously misshapen. White walls rose to either side as he and Rowan made their way to the godswood; the paths between keep and tower and hall had turned into a maze of icy trenches, shoveled out hourly to keep them clear. It was easy to get lost in that frozen labyrinth, but Theon Greyjoy knew every twist and turning.
Even the godswood was turning white. A film of ice had formed upon the pool beneath the heart tree, and the face carved into its pale trunk had grown a mustache of little icicles. At this hour they could not hope to have the old gods to themselves. Rowan pulled Theon away from the northmen praying before the tree, to a secluded spot back by the barracks wall, beside a pool of warm mud that stank of rotten eggs. Even the mud was icing up about the edges, Theon saw. “Winter is coming …”
Rowan gave him a hard look. “You have no right to mouth Lord Eddard’s words. Not you. Not ever. After what you did—”
“You killed a boy as well.”
“That was not us. I told you.”
“Words are wind.” They are no better than me. We’re just the same. “You killed the others, why not him? Yellow Dick—”
“—stank as bad as you. A pig of a man.”
“And Little Walder was a piglet. Killing him brought the Freys and Manderlys to dagger points, that was cunning, you—”
“Not us.” Rowan grabbed him by the throat and shoved him back against the barracks wall, her face an inch from his. “Say it again and I will rip your lying tongue out, kinslayer.”
He smiled through his broken teeth. “You won’t. You need my tongue to get you past the guards. You need my lies.”
Rowan spat in his face. Then she let him go and wiped her gloved hands on her legs, as if just touching him had soiled her.
Theon knew he should not goad her. In her own way, this one was as dangerous as Skinner or Damon Dance-for-Me. But he was cold and tired, his head was pounding, he had not slept in days. “I have done terrible things … betrayed my own, turned my cloak, ordered the death of men who trusted me … but I am no kinslayer.”
“Stark’s boys were never brothers to you, aye. We know.”
That was true, but it was not what Theon had meant. They were not my blood, but even so, I never harmed them. The two we killed were just some miller’s sons. Theon did not want to think about their mother. He had known the miller’s wife for years, had even bedded her. Big heavy breasts with wide dark nipples, a sweet mouth, a merry laugh. Joys that I will never taste again.
But there was no use telling Rowan any of that. She would never believe his denials, any more than he believed hers. “There is blood on my hands, but not the blood of brothers,” he said wearily. “And I’ve been punished.”
“Not enough.” Rowan turned her back on him.
Foolish woman. He might well be a broken thing, but Theon still wore a dagger. It would have been a simple thing to slide it out and drive it down between her shoulder blades. That much he was still capable of, missing teeth and broken teeth and all. It might even be a kindness—a quicker, cleaner end than the one she and her sisters would face when Ramsay caught them.
Reek might have done it. Would have done it, in hopes it might please Lord Ramsay. These whores meant to steal Ramsay’s bride; Reek could not allow that. But the old gods had known him, had called him Theon. Ironborn, I was ironborn, Balon Greyjoy’s son and rightful heir to Pyke. The stumps of his fingers itched and twitched, but he kept his dagger in its sheath.
When Squirrel returned, the other four were with her: gaunt grey-haired Myrtle, Willow Witch-Eye with her long black braid, Frenya of the thick waist and enormous breasts, Holly with her knife. Clad as serving girls in layers of drab grey roughspun, they wore brown woolen cloaks lined with white rabbit fur. No swords, Theon saw. No axes, no hammers, no weapons but knives. Holly’s cloak was fastened with a silver clasp, and Frenya had a girdle of hempen rope wound about her middle from her hips to breasts. It made her look even more massive than she was.
Myrtle had servant’s garb for Rowan. “The yards are crawling with fools,” she warned them. “They mean to ride out.”
“Kneelers,” said Willow, with a snort of contempt. “Their lordly lord spoke, they must obey.”
“They’re going to die,” chirped Holly, happily.
“Them and us,” said Theon. “Even if we do get past the guards, how do you mean to get Lady Arya out?”
Holly smiled. “Six women go in, six come out. Who looks at serving girls? We’ll dress the Stark girl up as Squirrel.”
Theon glanced at Squirrel. They are almost of a size. It might work. “And how does Squirrel get out?”
Squirrel answered for herself. “Out a window, and straight down to the godswood. I was twelve the first time my brother took me raiding south o’ your Wall. That’s where I got my name. My brother said I looked like a squirrel running up a tree. I’ve done that Wall six times since, over and back again. I think I can climb down some stone tower.”
“Happy, turncloak?” Rowan asked. “Let’s be about it.”
Winterfell’s cavernous kitchen occupied a building all its own, set well apart from the castle’s main halls and keeps in case of fire. Inside, the smells changed hour by hour—an ever-changing perfume of roast meats, leeks and onions, fresh-baked bread. Roose Bolton had posted guards at the kitchen door. With so many mouths to feed, every scrap of food was precious. Even the cooks and potboys were watched constantly. But the guards knew Reek. They liked to taunt him when he came to fetch hot water for Lady Arya’s bath. None of them dared go further than that, though. Reek was known to be Lord Ramsay’s pet.
“The Prince of Stink is come for some hot water,” one guard announced when Theon and his serving girls appeared before him. He pushed the door open for them. “Quick now, before all that sweet warm air escapes.”
Within, Theon grabbed a passing potboy by the arm. “Hot water for m’lady, boy,” he commanded. “Six pails full, and see that it’s good and hot. Lord Ramsay wants her pink and clean.”
“Aye, m’lord,” the boy said. “At once, m’lord.”
“At once” took longer than Theon would have liked. None of the big kettles was clean, so the potboy had to scrub one out before filling it with water. Then it seemed to take forever to come to a rolling boil and twice forever to fill six wooden pails. All the while Abel’s women waited, their faces shadowed by their cowls. They are doing it all wrong. Real serving girls were always teasing the potboys, flirting with the cooks, wheedling a taste of this, a bite of that. Rowan and her scheming sisters did not want to attract notice, but their sullen silence soon had the guards giving them queer looks. “Where’s Maisie and Jez and t’other girls?” one asked Theon. “The usual ones.”
“Lady Arya was displeased with them,” he lied. “Her water was cold before it reached the tub last time.”
The hot water filled the air with clouds of steam, melting the snowflakes as they came drifting down. Back through the maze of ice-walled trenches went the procession. With every sloshing step the water cooled. The passages were clogged with troops: armored knights in woolen surcoats and fur cloaks, men-at-arms with spears across their shoulders, archers carrying unstrung bows and sheaves of arrows, freeriders, grooms leading warhorses. The Frey men wore the badge of the two towers, those from White Harbor displayed merman and trident. They shouldered through the storm in opposite directions and eyed each other warily as they passed, but no swords were drawn. Not here. It may be different out there in the woods.
Half a dozen seasoned Dreadfort men guarded the doors of the Great Keep. “Another bloody bath?” said their serjeant when he saw the pails of steaming water. He had his hands tucked up into his armpits against the cold. “She had a bath last night. How dirty can one woman get in her own bed?”
Dirtier than you know, when you share that bed with Ramsay, Theon thought, remembering the wedding night and the things that he and Jeyne had been made to do. “Lord Ramsay’s command.”
“Get in there, then, before the water freezes,” the serjeant said. Two of the guards pushed open the double doors.
The entryway was nigh as cold as the air outside. Holly kicked snow from her boots and lowered the hood of her cloak. “I thought that would be harder.” Her breath frosted the air.
“There are more guards upstairs at m’lord’s bedchamber,” Theon warned her. “Ramsay’s men.” He dare not call them the Bastard’s Boys, not here. You never knew who might be listening. “Keep your heads down and your hoods up.”
“Do as he says, Holly,” Rowan said. “There’s some will know your face. We don’t need that trouble.”
Theon led the way up the stairs. I have climbed these steps a thousand times before. As a boy he would run up; descending, he would take the steps three at a time, leaping. Once he leapt right into Old Nan and knocked her to the floor. That earned him the worst thrashing he ever had at Winterfell, though it was almost tender compared to the beatings his brothers used to give him back on Pyke. He and Robb had fought many a heroic battle on these steps, slashing at one another with wooden swords. Good training, that; it brought home how hard it was to fight your way up a spiral stair against determined opposition. Ser Rodrik liked to say that one good man could hold a hundred, fighting down.
That was long ago, though. They were all dead now. Jory, old Ser Rodrik, Lord Eddard, Harwin and Hullen, Cayn and Desmond and Fat Tom, Alyn with his dreams of knighthood, Mikken who had given him his first real sword. Even Old Nan, like as not.
And Robb. Robb who had been more a brother to Theon than any son born of Balon Greyjoy’s loins. Murdered at the Red Wedding, butchered by the Freys. I should have been with him. Where was I? I should have died with him.
Theon stopped so suddenly that Willow almost plowed into his back. The door to Ramsay’s bedchamber was before him. And guarding it were two of the Bastard’s Boys, Sour Alyn and Grunt.
The old gods must wish us well. Grunt had no tongue and Sour Alyn had no wits, Lord Ramsay liked to say. One was brutal, the other mean, but both had spent most of their lives in service at the Dreadfort. They did as they were told.
“I have hot water for the Lady Arya,” Theon told them.
“Try a wash yourself, Reek,” said Sour Alyn. “You smell like horse piss.” Grunt grunted in agreement. Or perhaps that noise was meant to be a laugh. But Alyn unlocked the door to the bedchamber, and Theon waved the women through.
No day had dawned inside this room. Shadows covered all. One last log crackled feebly amongst the dying embers in the hearth, and a candle flickered on the table beside a rumpled, empty bed. The girl is gone, Theon thought. She has thrown herself out a window in despair. But the windows here were shuttered against the storm, sealed up by crusts of blown snow and frost. “Where is she?” Holly asked. Her sisters emptied their pails into the big round wooden tub. Frenya shut the chamber door and put her back against it. “Where is she?” Holly said again. Outside a horn was blowing. A trumpet. The Freys, assembling for battle. Theon could feel an itching in his missing fingers.
Then he saw her. She was huddled in the darkest corner of the bedchamber, on the floor, curled up in a ball beneath a pile of wolfskins. Theon might never have spotted her but for the way she trembled. Jeyne had pulled the furs up over herself to hide. From us? Or was she expecting her lord husband? The thought that Ramsay might be coming made him want to scream. “My lady.” Theon could not bring himself to call her Arya and dare not call her Jeyne. “No need to hide. These are friends.”
The furs stirred. An eye peered out, shining with tears. Dark, too dark. A brown eye. “Theon?”
“Lady Arya.” Rowan moved closer. “You must come with us, and quickly. We’ve come to take you to your brother.”
“Brother?” The girl’s face emerged from underneath the wolfskins. “I … I have no brothers.”
She has forgotten who she is. She has forgotten her name. “That’s so,” said Theon, “but you had brothers once. Three of them. Robb and Bran and Rickon.”
“They’re dead. I have no brothers now.”
“You have a half-brother,” Rowan said. “Lord Crow, he is.”
“Jon Snow?”
“We’ll take you to him, but you must come at once.”
Jeyne pulled her wolfskins up to her chin. “No. This is some trick. It’s him, it’s my … my lord, my sweet lord, he sent you, this is just some test to make sure that I love him. I do, I do, I love him more than anything.” A tear ran down her cheek. “Tell him, you tell him. I’ll do what he wants … whatever he wants … with him or … or with the dog or … please … he doesn’t need to cut my feet off, I won’t try to run away, not ever, I’ll give him sons, I swear it, I swear it …”
Rowan whistled softly. “Gods curse the man.”
“I’m a good girl,” Jeyne whimpered. “They trained me.”
Willow scowled. “Someone stop her crying. That guard was mute, not deaf. They’re going to hear.”
“Get her up, turncloak.” Holly had her knife in hand. “Get her up or I will. We have to go. Get the little cunt up on her feet and shake some courage into her.”
“And if she screams?” said Rowan.
We are all dead, Theon thought. I told them this was folly, but none of them would listen. Abel had doomed them. All singers were half-mad. In songs, the hero always saved the maiden from the monster’s castle, but life was not a song, no more than Jeyne was Arya Stark. Her eyes are the wrong color. And there are no heroes here, only whores. Even so, he knelt beside her, pulled down the furs, touched her cheek. “You know me. I’m Theon, you remember. I know you too. I know your name.”
“My name?” She shook her head. “My name … it’s …”
He put a finger to her lips. “We can talk about that later. You need to be quiet now. Come with us. With me. We will take you away from here. Away from him.”
Her eyes widened. “Please,” she whispered. “Oh, please.”
Theon slipped his hand through hers. The stumps of his lost fingers tingled as he drew the girl to her feet. The wolfskins fell away from her. Underneath them she was naked, her small pale breasts covered with teeth marks. He heard one of the women suck in her breath. Rowan thrust a bundle of clothes into his hands. “Get her dressed. It’s cold outside.” Squirrel had stripped down to her smallclothes, and was rooting through a carved cedar chest in search of something warmer. In the end she settled for one of Lord Ramsay’s quilted doublets and a well-worn pair of breeches that flapped about her legs like a ship’s sails in a storm.
With Rowan’s help, Theon got Jeyne Poole into Squirrel’s clothes. If the gods are good and the guards are blind, she may pass. “Now we are going out and down the steps,” Theon told the girl. “Keep your head down and your hood up. Follow Holly. Don’t run, don’t cry, don’t speak, don’t look anyone in the eye.”
“Stay close to me,” Jeyne said. “Don’t leave me.”
“I will be right beside you,” Theon promised as Squirrel slipped into Lady Arya’s bed and pulled the blanket up.
Frenya opened the bedchamber door.
“You give her a good wash, Reek?” asked Sour Alyn as they emerged. Grunt gave Willow’s breast a squeeze as she went by. They were fortunate in his choice. If the man had touched Jeyne, she might have screamed. Then Holly would have opened his throat for him with the knife hidden up her sleeve. Willow simply twisted away and past him.
For a moment Theon felt almost giddy. They never looked. They never saw. We walked the girl right by them!
But on the steps the fear returned. What if they met Skinner or Damon Dance-for-Me or Steelshanks Walton? Or Ramsay himself? Gods save me, not Ramsay, anyone but him. What use was it to smuggle the girl out of her bedchamber? They were still inside the castle, with every gate closed and barred and the battlements thick with sentries. Like as not, the guards outside the keep would stop them. Holly and her knife would be of small use against six men in mail with swords and spears.
But the guards outside were huddled by the doors, backs turned against the icy wind and blown snow. Even the serjeant did not spare them more than a quick glance. Theon felt a stab of pity for him and his men. Ramsay would flay them all when he learned his bride was gone, and what he would do to Grunt and Sour Alyn did not bear thinking about.
Not ten yards from the door, Rowan dropped her empty pail, and her sisters did likewise. The Great Keep was already lost to sight behind them. The yard was a white wilderness, full of half-heard sounds that echoed strangely amidst the storm. The icy trenches rose around them, knee high, then waist high, then higher than their heads. They were in the heart of Winterfell with the castle all around them, but no sign of it could be seen. They might have easily been lost amidst the Land of Always Winter, a thousand leagues beyond the Wall. “It’s cold,” Jeyne Poole whimpered as she stumbled along at Theon’s side.
And soon to be colder. Beyond the castle walls, winter was waiting with its icy teeth. If we get that far. “This way,” he said when they came to a junction where three trenches crossed.
“Frenya, Holly, go with them,” Rowan said. “We will be along with Abel. Do not wait for us.” And with that, she whirled and plunged into the snow, toward the Great Hall. Willow and Myrtle hurried after her, cloaks snapping in the wind.
Madder and madder, thought Theon Greyjoy. Escape had seemed unlikely with all six of Abel’s women; with only two, it seemed impossible. But they had gone too far to return the girl to her bedchamber and pretend none of this had ever happened. Instead he took Jeyne by the arm and drew her down the pathway to the Battlements Gate. Only a halfgate, he reminded himself. Even if the guards let us pass, there is no way through the outer wall. On other nights, the guards had allowed Theon through, but all those times he’d come alone. He would not pass so easily with three serving girls in tow, and if the guards looked beneath Jeyne’s hood and recognized Lord Ramsay’s bride …
The passage twisted to the left. There before them, behind a veil of falling snow, yawned the Battlements Gate, flanked by a pair of guards. In their wool and fur and leather, they looked as big as bears. The spears they held were eight feet tall. “Who goes there?” one called out. Theon did not recognize the voice. Most of the man’s features were covered by the scarf about his face. Only his eyes could be seen. “Reek, is that you?”
Yes, he meant to say. Instead he heard himself reply, “Theon Greyjoy. I … I have brought some women for you.”
“You poor boys must be freezing,” said Holly. “Here, let me warm you up.” She slipped past the guard’s spearpoint and reached up to his face, pulling loose the half-frozen scarf to plant a kiss upon his mouth. And as their lips touched, her blade slid through the meat of his neck, just below the ear. Theon saw the man’s eyes widen. There was blood on Holly’s lips as she stepped back, and blood dribbling from his mouth as he fell.
The second guard was still gaping in confusion when Frenya grabbed the shaft of his spear. They struggled for a moment, tugging, till the woman wrenched the weapon from his fingers and clouted him across the temple with its butt. As he stumbled backwards, she spun the spear around and drove its point through his belly with a grunt.
Jeyne Poole let out a shrill, high scream.
“Oh, bloody shit,” said Holly. “That will bring the kneelers down on us, and no mistake. Run!”
Theon clapped one hand around Jeyne’s mouth, grabbed her about the waist with the other, and pulled her past the dead and dying guards, through the gate, and over the frozen moat. And perhaps the old gods were still watching over them; the drawbridge had been left down, to allow Winterfell’s defenders to cross to and from the outer battlements more quickly. From behind them came alarums and the sounds of running feet, then the blast of a trumpet from the ramparts of the inner wall.
On the drawbridge, Frenya stopped and turned. “Go on. I will hold the kneelers here.” The bloody spear was still clutched in her big hands.
Theon was staggering by the time he reached the foot of the stair. He slung the girl over his shoulder and began to climb. Jeyne had ceased to struggle by then, and she was such a little thing besides … but the steps were slick with ice beneath soft powdery snow, and halfway up he lost his footing and went down hard on one knee. The pain was so bad he almost lost the girl, and for half a heartbeat he feared this was as far as he would go. But Holly pulled him back onto his feet, and between the two of them they finally got Jeyne up to the battlements.
As he leaned up against a merlon, breathing hard, Theon could hear the shouting from below, where Frenya was fighting half a dozen guardsmen in the snow. “Which way?” he shouted at Holly. “Where do we go now? How do we get out?”
The fury on Holly’s face turned to horror. “Oh, fuck me bloody. The rope.” She gave a hysterical laugh. “Frenya has the rope.” Then she grunted and grabbed her stomach. A quarrel had sprouted from her gut. When she wrapped a hand around it, blood leaked through her fingers. “Kneelers on the inner wall …” she gasped, before a second shaft appeared between her breasts. Holly grabbed for the nearest merlon and fell. The snow that she’d knocked loose buried her with a soft thump.
Shouts rang out from their left. Jeyne Poole was staring down at Holly as the snowy blanket over her turned from white to red. On the inner wall the crossbowman would be reloading, Theon knew. He started right, but there were men coming from that direction too, racing toward them with swords in hand. Far off to the north he heard a warhorn sound. Stannis, he thought wildly. Stannis is our only hope, if we can reach him. The wind was howling, and he and the girl were trapped.
The crossbow snapped. A bolt passed within a foot of him, shattering the crust of frozen snow that had plugged the closest crenel. Of Abel, Rowan, Squirrel, and the others there was no sign. He and the girl were alone. If they take us alive, they will deliver us to Ramsay.
Theon grabbed Jeyne about the waist and jumped.

